[5001]
This hadith is reported on the authority of Laith b. Sa'd with the same chain of transmitters, but with a slight variation in wording (and that is that) he (the Holy Prophet) said: There is a day in a year when descends the pestilence; at the end of the hadith Laith said that the non Arabs save themselves from it in Kanun Awwal (this is the month of December).
[5002]
Salim, on the authority of his father, reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: Do not leave the fire burning in your houses when you go to sleep.
[5003]
Abu Musa reported that a house was burnt down in Medina during the night over its inhabitants. When their matter was reported to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), he said; This fire is an enemy of yours. So when you go to sleep, extinguish it.
[5004]
Hudhaifa reported: When we attended a dinner along with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) we did not lay our hands on the food until Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had laid his hand and commenced eating (the food). Once we went with him to a dinner when a girl came rushingly as it someone had been pursuing her. She was about to lay her hand on the food, when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) caught her hand. Then a desert Arab came there (rushingly) as if someone had been pursuing him. He (the Holy Prophet) caught his hand; and then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Satan considers that food lawful on which Allah's name is not mentioned. He had brought this girl so that the food might be made lawful for him and I caught her hand. And he had brought a desert Arab so that (the food) might be lawful for him. So I caught his hand. By Him, in Whose hand is my life, it was (Satan's) hand that was in my hand along with her hand.
[5005]
Hudhaifa b. al-Yaman reported: When we were invited to a dinner with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him); the rest of hadith is the same but there is a slight variation of wording (and the variation is) that in that hadith the desert Arab precedes the arrival of that girl, and at the conclusion there is an addition (to this effect): "He (the Holy Prophet) then mentioned the name of Allah and ate." This hadith is reported on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[5006]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When a person enters his house and mentions the name of Allah at the time of entering it and while eating the food, Satan says (addressing himself: You have no place to spend the night and no evening meal; but when he enters without mentioning the name of Allah, the Satan says: You have found a place to spend the night, and when he does not mention the name of Allah while eating food, he (the Satan) says: You have found a place to spend the night and evening meal. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Jabir b. Abdullah through the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[5007]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: Do not eat with your left hand, for the Satan eats with his left hand.
[5008]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When any one of you intends to eat (meal), he should eat with his right hand. and when he (intends) to drink he should drink with his right hand, for the Satan eats with his left hand and drinks with his left hand.
[5009]
This hadith is reported by Zuhri on the authority of Sufyan with a different chain of transmitters.
[5010]
Salim, on the authority of his father, reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: None of you should eat with his left hand and drink with that (left hand), for the Satan eats with left hand and drinks with that (hand). Nafi' has made this addition in that: "Do not take up anything with that (left hand) and do not give anything with that"; and in the narration transmitted on the authority of Abu Tahir there is a slight variation of wording.
[5011]
Salama b. Akwa' reported on the authority of his father that a person ate in the presence of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) with his left hand, whereupon he said: Eat with your right hand. He said: I cannot do that, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: May you not be able to do that. It was vanity that prevented him from doing it, and he could not raise it (the right hand) up to his mouth.
[5012]
'Umar b. Abu Salama reported: I was under the care of Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him), and as my hand used to roam about in the dish he said to me: Boy, mention the name of Allah, and eat with your right hand and eat from what is near to you.
[5013]
Umar b. Abu Salama reported: I (had the opportunity) one day to dine with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and I picked up flesh from around the dish. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Eat from that which is near to you.
[5014]
Abu Sa'id (Khudri) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade from turning the waterskins upside down and drinking from its mouth.
[5015]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported that Allah's, Messenger (may peace he upon him) forbade from turning the waterskins upside down and drinking from their mouths.
[5016]
This hadith has been reported from Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters, but he also said that Ikhtinath means that its head (i.e., of the waterskin) be turned upside down and then (water) be drank from that.
[5017]
Anas reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) disapproved the drinking of water while standing.
[5018]
Anas reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) forbade that a person should drink while standing. Qatada reported: We said to him: What about eating? Thereupon he (Anas) said: That is even worse and more detestable (abominable).
[5019]
This hadith is reported on the authority of Anas with a different chain of transmitters, but no mention is mane of the words of Qatada.
[5020]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) warned against drinking while standing.
[5021]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported this hadith through another chain of transmitters but with a slight, variation of wording.
[5022]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: None of you should drink while standing; and if anyone forgets, he must vomit.
[5023]
Ibn Abbas reported: I served.(water of) Zamzam to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and he drank it while standing.
[5024]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) drank (water) from Zamzam in a bucket while he was standing.
[5025]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) drank (water) from Zamzam while he was standing.
[5026]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: I served (water from) Zamzam to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and he drank while standing, and he asked for it while he was near the House (i.e. House of Allah-Ka'ba).
[5027]
This hadith is reported on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[5028]
Abu Qatada reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) forbade breathing in a vessel.
[5029]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to breathe three times in the course of a drink (i.e. he drank in three gulps).
[5030]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) breathed three times (outside the vessel) in the course of a drink and said: It is more thirst- quenching, healthier and more wholesome. Anas said: So I also breathe three times in the course of a drink.
[5031]
This hadith is reported on the authority of Anas with a slight variation of wording.
[5032]
Anas b. Malik reported that there was brought to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) a cup of milk mixed with water, while there was on his right a desert Arab and on his left Abu Bakr. He (the Holy Prophet) drank; he then gave it to the desert Arab and said: (Give to one) who is on the right, then again who is on the right.
[5033]
Anas reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace he upon him) came to Medina when I was ten years old and he died when I was twenty years old. My mother exhorted me to serve him. He (the Holy Prophet) came to our house, and we ruined a flabby goat for him and mixed it (the milk) with water from the well of the house. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) drank that. Umar and Abu Bakr on his left side said to him: Allah's Messenger, give it to Abu Bakr, but he (the Holy Prophet) gave it to the desert Arab who was on his right. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He who is on the right, then he who is on the right.
[5034]
Anas b. Malik reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to our house and he asked for a drink. We milked a goat for him and then mixed it (the milk) with the water of this well of mine. I gave it to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and he drank it, while Abu Bakr was on his left and 'Umar was in front of him, and a desert Arab was on his right. When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had finished the drink, Umar said: Allah's Messenger, here is Abu Bakr, give him to drink; but Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave it to the desert Arab and he left out Abu Bakr and Umar. And Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Those on the right, those on the right, those on the right (deserve preference). Anas said: This is the Sunnah, this is the Sunnah, this is the Sunnah.
[5035]
Sahl b. Sa'd Sa'idi reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was given a drink, and he drank from that, and there was on his right side a boy. and on his left some old men. He said to the boy: Do you permit me to give it to them (the old men), but that boy said: by God. I will not give preference at your hand over me in my share. He (the narrator) said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) then gave it in his hand.
[5036]
This hadith is reported on the authority of Sahl b. Sa'd with a slight variation of wording.
[5037]
Ibn 'Abbas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him.) as saying: When any one of you eats food he should not wipe his hand until he has licked it himself or has given it to someone else to lick.
[5038]
Ibn 'Abbas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When any one of you eats food he should not wipe his hand until he has licked it or got it licked by (someone else).
[5039]
Ibn Ka'b b. Malik reported on the authority of his father that he saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) licking his three fingers (after having finished the food). Ibn Hatim made no mention of "three". This hadith is also narrated through another chain of transmitters.
[5040]
Ibn Ka'b b. Malik reported on the authority of his father that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to eat (food) with three fingers and he licked his hand before wiping it (with towel).
[5041]
'Abdullah b. Ka'b reported that his father Ka'b narrated to him that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to eat with three fingers and when he had finished (eating), he licked them.
[5042]
A hadith like this has been reported on the authority of Ka'b b. Malik through another chain of transmitters.
[5043]
Jabir reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded the licking of fingers and the dish, saying: You do not know in what portion the blessing lies."
[5044]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When any one of you drops a mouthful he should pick it up and remove any of the filth on it, and then eat it, and should not leave it for the Satan, and should not wipe his hand with towel until he has licked his fingers, for he does not know in what portion of the food the blessing lies.
[5045]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sufyan with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[5046]
Jabir reported: I heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Satan is present with any one of you in everything he does; he is present even when he eats food; so if any one of you drops a mouthful he should remove away anything filthy on it and eat it and not leave for the devil; and when he finishes (food) he should lick his fingers, for he does not know in what portion of his food the blessing lies.
[5047]
This hadith is reported on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of words but no mention is made of the first part of the hadith, i.e. the Satan is present with any one of you.
[5048]
Jabir reported from Allah's Messenger. (may peace be upon him) about mentioning the licking (of fingers) and the (falling of) the mouthful.
[5049]
Anas reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) ate food he licked his three fingers, and he said: When any one of you drops a mouthful he should remove anything filthy from it and then eat it, and should not leave it for the Satan. He also commanded us that we should wipe the dish saying: You do not know in what portion of your food the blessing lies.
[5050]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When any one of you cats food he should lick his fingers, for hen does not know in what part of the food sticking to his fingers the blessing lies. This hadith has been reported on the authority of Hammad with the same chain of transmitters, but with a slight variation of wording.
[5051]
Abu Mas'ud Ansari reported that a person from the Ansar who was called Abu Shu'aib had a slave who was a butcher (by profession). He (Abu Mas'ud) saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and found signs of hunger on his face. He said to the servant: 0 ye, prepare for us food sufficient for five persons, for I intend to invite Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) who would be the fifth amongst the five. He (the narrator) reported that he then prepared the food and came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and invited all the five (including him) who was the fifth amongst them to the feast. A man followed him and when Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) reached the door, he said: This man has followed us; if you like you may permit him (to join the meal) and if you like he can go back. Thereupon the person said: Allah's Messenger, I permit him.
[5052]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Abu Mas'ud Ansari through another chain of transmitters.
[5053]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Jabir also.
[5054]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had a neighbour who was Persian (by descent), and he was expert in the preparation of soup. He prepared (soup) for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and then came to him to invite him (to that feast). He (Allah's Messenger) said: Here is 'A'isha also (and you should also invite her to the food). He said: No. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) also said: No (then I cannot join the feast). He returned inviting him, and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: She is also there (i.e. 'A'isha should also be invited). He said: No. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) also said: No (and declined his offer). He returned again to invite him and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) again said: She is also there. He (the host) said: "Yes" for the third time. Then he accepted his invitation, and both of them set out until they came to his house.
[5055]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) went out (of his house) one day or one night, and there he found Abu Bakr and 'Umar also. He said: What has brought you out of your houses at this hour? They said: Allah's Messenger, it is hunger. Thereupon he said: By Him in Whose Hand is my life, what has brought you out has brought me out too; get up. They got up along with him. and (all of them) came to the house of an Ansari, but he was not at home. When his wife saw him she said: Most welcome, and Allah's Messenger (may peace be Upon him) said to her: Where is so and so? She said: He has gone to get some fresh water for us. When the Ansari came and he saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and his two Companions, he said: Praise be to Allah, no one has more honourable guests today than I (have). He then went out and brought them a bunch of ripe dates, dry dates and fresh dates, and said: Eat some of them. He then took hold of his long knife (for slaughtering a goat or a sheep). Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: Beware of killing a milch animal. He slaughtered a sheep for them and after they had eaten of it and of the bunch and drank, and when they had taken their fill and had been fully satisfied with the drink, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to Abu Bakr and Umar: By Him in Whose Hand is my life, you will certainly be questioned about this bounty on the Day of judgment. Hunger brought you out of your house, then you did not return until this bounty came to you.
[5056]
Abu Huraira reported: One day while Abu Bakr was sitting and there was with him Umar also there came to them Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and he said: What makes you stay here? They said: It is hunger that has brought us out from our houses. By Him Who has stint you with Truth; the rest of the hadith is the same.
[5057]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: When the ditch was dug, I saw Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) feeling very hungry. I came to my wife and said to her: Is there anything with you? I have seen Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) feeling extremely hungry. She brought out a bag of provisions which contained a sa', of barley. We had also with us a lamb. I slaughtered it. She ground the flour. She finished (this work) along with me. I cut it into pieces and put it in the earthen pot and then returned to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) (for inviting him). She said: Do not humiliate me in the presence of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and those who are with him. When I came to him I whispered to him saying: Allah's Messenger, we have slaughtered a lamb for you and she has ground a sa' of barley which we had with us. So you come along with a group of people with you. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said loudly: O people of the ditch, Jabir has arranged a feast for you, so (come along). Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Do not remove your earthen pot from the hearth and do not bake the bread from the kneaded flour until I come. So I came and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came and he was ahead of the people; and I came to my wife and she said (to me): You will be humbled. I said: I did what you had asked me to do. She (his wife) said: I brought out the kneaded flour and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) put some saliva of his in that and blessed It. He then put saliva in the earthen pot and blessed it and then said. Call another baker who can bake with you. and bring out the soup from it, but do not remove it from the hearth, and the guests were one thousand. (Jabir said): I take an oath by Allah that all of them ate (the food to their fill) until they left it and went away and our earthen pot was brimming over as before, and so was the case with our flour, or as Dahhak (another narrator) said: It (the flour) was in the same condition and loaves had been prepared from that.
[5058]
Anas b. Malik reported that Abu Talha said to Umm Sulaim: I felt some feebleness in the voice of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and perceived that it was due to hunger; so have you anything with you ? She said: Yes. She brought out barley loaves, then took out a head-covering of hers, in a part of which she wrapped those loaves and then put them beneath my mantle and covered me with a part of it. She then sent me to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). I set forth and found Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sitting in the mosque in the company of some persons. I stood near them, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Has Abu Talha sent you ? I said, Yes. He said: Is it for a feast ? I said. Yes. Thereupon Allah's messenger (may peace be upon him) said to'those who were with him to get up He went forth and so I did before them, until I came to Abu Talha and informed him. Abu Talba said: Umm Sulaim, here comes Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) along with people and we do not have enough (food) to feed them. She said: Allah and His Messenger know best. Abu Talha went out (to receive him) Until he met Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) came forward along with him until they both (Allah's Messenger, along with Abu Talha) came in. Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Umm Sulaim. bring forth that which you have with you. She brought the bread. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded that the bread be broken into small pieces, and when Umm Sulaim had squeezed a small waterskin and put seasoning on it, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) recited something regarding it what Allah wished him to say. He then said: Allow ten (guests to come in and have their meals). He permitted them; they ate until they had their fill. They then went out. He (the Holy Prophet) again said: Permit ten (more) and he (the host gave permission to them. They ate until they had enough. Then they went out. he again said: Permit ten (more) until all the people had eaten to their fill, and they were seventy or eighty persons.
[5059]
Anas b. Malik reported : Abu Talha sent me to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in order to invite him (for meal). She had prepared a meal. So I came and found Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) along with some people. He looked at me, and I felt shy and said : Accept the invitation of Abu Talha. He (the Holy Prophet) asked the people to get up. Thereupon Abu Talha said : Allah's Messenger, I have prepared something for you. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) touched (the food) and invoked blessings upon it, and then said : Let ten persons from my Companions enter (the house). He then said : Eat, and (in the meanwhile) brought out something from between his fingers for them. They then began to eat until they had their fill and then went out. He then asked ten more men (to have the meal) and they ate to their fill, and the ten persons went on getting in (and eating the food) and then getting out until none was left amongst them who had not got in and eaten to his fill. He then collected (the remaining part of the food) and it (the quantity of the food) was the same (as it had been prior to the serving of guests).
[5060]
Anas b Malik reported : Abu Talha sent me to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) ; the rest of the hadith is the same, but 'there is a slight variation of wording that he said at the end (The Holy Prophet) took what was left (of the food) and collected it and then invoked blessings upon it and it returned to its original state. He (the Holy Prophet) then said Take this.
[5061]
Anas b. Malik reported : Abu Talha ordered Umm Sulaim to prepare a meal specially for Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). He then sent me to him (to the Holy Prophet) ; the rest of the hadith is the same (but there is a slight variation of wording) : "Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) placed his hand and mentioned the name of Allah upon that, and then said : Admit ten men. He (Abu Talha) admitted them and they got in. He (the Holy Prophet) said : Eat while mentioning the name of Allah upon it (the meal). They ate until eighty persons had taken the food. Then Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had his meal and so the members of the household, and still they left some food."
[5062]
Anas b. Malik reported this incident pertaining to the feast given by Abu Talha to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) with the addition of these words : "Abu Talha stood at the door (to welcome the honourable guest) until Allah's Messenger (may peacec be upon him) came there, He (Abu Talha) said to him : Allah's Messenger, the thing (we intend to offer you as a meal) is small in quantity. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said : Bring that, for Allah will soon bless it (and increase it).
[5063]
Anas b. Malik reported this hadith (with a slight variation of wording) Then AlIah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) ate and the people of his house also ate. but (still) there was left a surplus, which they sent to their neighbours.
[5064]
Anas b. Malik reported: Abu Talha saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) lying down upon his belly in the mosque. He came to Umm Sulaim and said: I saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) lying down upon the belly in the mosque, and I think he is hungry. The rest of the hadith is the same (but with the addition of these words) that Allah's messenger (may peace be upon him) ate (the food) and so did Abu Talha, Umm Sulaim and Anas b. Malik, but there was left some. thing which we presented to our neighbours.
[5065]
Anas b. Malik reported: I visited Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) one day and found him sitting in the company of his Companions and talking to them, and he had tied his belly with a bandage. Usama said: I am in doubt whether there was stone on that (his belly) or not. I asked some of his Companions why Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had bandaged his belly. They said: (He has done that to relieve) his hunger. I went to Abu Talha, the husband of Umm Sulaim, the daughter of Milhan, and said to him: Father, I saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having bandaged his belly. I asked some of his Companions (the reason of it) and they said that it was due to hunger. Abu Talha came to mv mother and said: Is there anything? She said: Yes, I have some pieces of bread with me and some dates. If Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) comes to us alone we can feed him to his fill, but if someone comes along with him this would be insufficient for them. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[5066]
Anas b. Malik reported this hadith pertaining to the entertainment of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) by Abu Talha through another chain of transmitters.
[5067]
Anas b. Malik reported: A tailor invited Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to a meal which he had prepared. Anas b. Malik said: I went along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to that feast. He presented to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) barley bread and soup containing pumpkin, and sliced pieces of meat. Anas said: I saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) going after the pumpkin round the dish, so I have always liked the pumpkin since that day.
[5068]
Anas b. Malik reported that a person invited Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to a meal. I also went along with him. He brought soup containing pumpkin. Allah's 'messenger (may peace be upon him) ate that pumpkin with relish. He (Anas) said: When I saw that I began to place it before him, and did not eat it (myself). Anas said: It was since then that pumpkin was always my favourite (food).
[5069]
Anas b. Malik rdported that a tailor invited Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to a feast. There has been an addition to this that Thabit said: I heard Anas saying that any meal that was prepared for me after that I tried that it should contain pumpkin.
[5070]
'Abdullah b. Busr reported: AUah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to my father and we brought to him a meal and a preparation from dates, cheese and butter. He ate out of that. He was then given dates which he ate but he placed their stones between his fingers, and he joined his forefinger and middle finger. Shu'ba reported: I think that this hadith God's willing also contains (these words): Putting of date stones between two fingers. Then a drink was brought for him and he drank it, and then gave it to one who was on his right side. He (the narrator) said: My father took hold of the rein of his riding animal and requested him to supplicate for us. Thereupon he said: O Allah. bless them in what Thou hast provided them as a sustenance; and forgive them and have mercy upon them.
[5071]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters and they did not doubt about keeping the dates between his fingers (as is expressed in the previous hadith).
[5072]
'Abdullah b. Ja'far reported: I saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) eating cucumber with fresh dates.
[5073]
Anas b. Malik reported: I saw Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) squatting and eating dates.
[5074]
Anas reported that there were brought to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) dates. He distributed them in the state that he had been sitting upright (in an easy posture) and he had also been eating them a (bit) quickly.
[5075]
Jabala b. Suhaim reported: Ibn Zubair used to provide us with dates during the time that the people were hard pressed because of famine (Once) as we were busy in eating there happened to appear before us Ibn 'Umar. He said: Don't eat two dates together, for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade eating them together but only after seeking permission from his brother (partner). Shu'ba said: I do not think these words pertaining to seeking permission but from the words of Ibn 'Urnar.
[5076]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters but these words of his (are not found): "The people were hard pressed because of the famine during those days."
[5077]
Jabala b. Suhaim reported: I heard Ibn 'Umar as saying that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade anyone taking two dates together without seeking the consent of his companions.
[5078]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A family which has dates will not be hungry.
[5079]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: 'A'isha a family which has no dates (in their house) its members will be hungry; (or) 'A'isha the family which has no dates its members may be hungry. He said this twice or thrice.
[5080]
Amir b. Sa'd b. Abu Waqqas, on the authority of his father, reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: He who ate seven dates (of the land situated) between these two lava plains in the morning, no poison will harm him until it is evening.
[5081]
'Amir b. Sa'd b. Abu Waqqas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who ate seven 'ajwa' dates in the morning, poison and magic will not harm him on that day.
[5082]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Ibn Hashim with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[5083]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The 'ajwa' dates of 'Aliya' contain heating effects and these are antidote in the early morning.
[5084]
Sa'id b. Zaid b. 'Amr b. Nufail reported: I heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Truffles are a kind of 'Manna' and their juice is a medicine for the eyes.
[5085]
Sa'id b. Zaid reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Truffles are a kind of blessing and their juice is a medicine for the eyes. Shu'ba said: When Hakam narrated this hadith to me, I did not deem it as a Munkar hadith because of the narration of Abd al-Malik.
[5086]
Sa'id b. Zaid b. 'Amr b. Nufail reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Truffles are a kind of 'Manna' which Allah the Glorious and Exalted, sent down upon the people of Israil, and its juice is a medicine for the eyes.
[5087]
Sa'id b. Zaid reported Allal a Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Truffles are a kind of 'Manna' which Allah sent down upon Moses and their juice is a medicine for the eyes.
[5088]
Sa'id b. Zaid reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : Truffles are 'Manna' which Allah, the Exalted the Majestic, sent to the people of Israil, and its juice is a medicine for the eyes.
[5089]
Sa'id b. Zaid reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Truffles are 'Manna' and its juice is the medicine for the eyes.
[5090]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported: We were with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) at Marr az-Zahran, and we were plucking the fruit of the Arak tree, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) said: Pluck only its black ones (for they are the most pleasant). We said: Allah's Messenger, it seems you shepherded the flock. He said: Yes. Has there been a prophet who did not shepherd it (or some words like it) ?
[5091]
'A'isha reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: The best of condiments or condiment is vinegar.
[5092]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Sulaiman b. Bilal with the same chain of transmitters and he is reported to have said: "The best condiment." And he did not doubt (about this word).
[5093]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) asked his family for condiment. They (the members of his household) said: We have nothing with us but vinegar. He asked for it, he began to eat it, and then said: Vinegar is a good condiment, vinegar is a good condiment.
[5094]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) took hold of my hand one day (and led me) to his residence. There was presented to him some pieces of bread, whereupon he said: Is there no condiment? They (the members of his household) said: No, except some vinegar. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Vinegar is a good condiment. Jabir said: I have always loved vinegar since I heard it trom Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). Talha said: I have always loved vinegar since I heard about it from Jabir.
[5095]
This hadith is reported on the authority of Jabir b. 'Abdullah that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) took hold of his hand and led him to his residence as narrated above up to the words: "Vinegar is a good condiment." But in the hadith transmitted through this chain of transmitters, there is no mention of the subsequent part.
[5096]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported : While I was sitting in my house there happened to pass by me Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). He made a gesture to me and I stood up for him. He took hold of my hand until we came to one of the apartments of his wives. He entered and then asked me to get in. So I entered and there was hanging a curtain beside her. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Is there any food (with you) ? They (the members of the household) said : Yes And then there were brought three loaves of bread for him (the Holy Prophet) and placed in the basket of palm leaves. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) picked up one loaf and placed that before him, and then picked up another one and placed it before me. He then picked up the third one and broke it into two parts, and kept the one-half before him and the other half before me, and then said : Is there any condiment ? They (the members of the household) said: There is nothing (in the form of condiment) but some vinegar only. He said : Bring that, for vinegar is a good condiment.
[5097]
Abd Ayydb Ansari reported that when food was brought to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) he ate out of that, and sent the remaining part to me, and one day he sent to me the left-over; (I found that he) had not taken from it at all for it included garlic. I asked him whether that was forbidden, whereupon he said : No, but I do not like it because of its odour. He (Abu Ayyub Ansiri) said: Then I also do not like what you do not like.
[5098]
This Hadith is narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[5099]
Aflah, the freed slave of Abu Ayyub Ansiri, reported: Allah's Messnger(may peace be upon him) had alighted in his house (viz. of Abu Ayyub Ansari at the time of his emigration to Medina) and he occupied the lower storey, whereas Abu Ayyub Ansari lived in the upper storey. One night, Abu Ayyub Ansari got up and said (to himself) : (How unfortunate it is) that we walk above the head of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), so they went aside and spent the night in a nook and then told Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) about it whereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: The lower storey is more comfortable (for me). but he (Abu Ayyub Ansari) said: We (would not live) over the roof under which you live. So Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) shifted to the upper storey, whereas Abu Ayyub Ansari shifted to the lower storey; and he (Abu Ayyub Ansari) used to prepare food for Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him); and when it was brought (back) to him he asked (to locate) the part, where his fingers had touched (the food), and he followed his fingers on that part where his fingers (those of the Holy Prophet) had touched it. (One day) he prepared food which contained garlic, and when it was returned to him he asked (to locate) the part which the fingers of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had touched. It was said to him that he had not eaten (the food). He (Abd Ayyub Ansari) was distressed and went up to him (to the Holy Prophet) and said: Is it forbidden? But Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: No, (it is not forbidden), but I do not like it. and he (Abu Ayyub Ansari) said: I also do not like what you do not like or which you did not like. He (Abu Ayyub Ansari) said: (The Holy Prophet did not eat garlic) as Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) was visited (by angels) and brought him the message of Allah.
[5100]
Abu Huraira reported that a person came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said : I am hard pressed by hunger. He sent (message) to one of his wives (to procure food for him). but she said: By Him Who has sent you with Truth, thrre is nothing with me (to serve him) but only water. He (the Holy Prophet) then sent the (same) message to another, and she gave the same reply, until all of them gave the same reply : By Him Who has sent thee with the Truth, there is nothing with me but only water, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Allah would show mercy to him who will entertain this guest tonight. A person from the Ansar stood up and said : Messenger of Allah, I (am ready to entertain). He took him to his house and said to his wife : Is there anything with you (to serve the gdest) ? She said: No, but only a subsistence for our children. He said : Distract their attention with something, and when the guest enters extinguish the lamp and give him the impression that we are eating. So they sat down. and the guest had his meal. When it was morning he went to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) who said: Allah was well pleased with what you both did for your guest this night.
[5101]
Abu Huraira reported that a guest spent the night with a person from the Ansar who had nothing with him but food (sufficient) for his own self and his children. He said to his wife: (Lull) the children to sleep, and put out the lamp, and serve the guest with what you have with you. It was on this occasion that this verse was revealed: "Those who prefer the needy to their own selves in spite of the fact that they are themselves in pressing need" (Lix. 9).
[5102]
Abu Huraira reported that a man came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) so that he should entertain him as a guest, but he had nothing with which he could entertain him. He, therefore, asked if there was any person who would entertain him (assuring the audience) that Allah would show mercy to him. A person from the Ansar who was called Abu Talha stood up and he took him to his house. The rest of the hadith is the same and mention is (also) made in that about the revelation of the verse as narrated by Waki'.
[5103]
Miqdad reported: I and two of my companions were so much afflicted by hunger that we had lost our power of seeing and hearing. We presented ourselves (as guests) to the Companions of the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him), but none amongst them would entertain us. So we came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), and he took us to his residence and there were three goats. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Milk these for us. So we milked them and every person amongst us drank his share and we set aside the share of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). (It was his habit) to come during the night and greet (the people present there) in a manner that would not wake up one in sleep but make one who was awake hear it. He would then go to the mosque and say prayer, then go to the milk and drink it. Miqdad added: One night the Satan came to me when I had taken my share, and he said: Muhammad has gone to the Ansar, who would offer him hospitality and he would get what is with them, and he has no need for this draught (of milk). So I took (that milk) and drank it, and when it had penetrated deeply in my stomach and I was certain that there was no way out (but to digest it), the Satan aroused (my sense of) remorse and said: Woe be to thee! what have you done? You have taken the drink reserved for Muhammad! When he would come and he would not find it, he would curse you, and you would be ruined, and thus there would go (waste) this world and the Hereafter (for) you. There was a sheet over me; as I placed (pulled) it upon my feet, my head was uncovered and as I placed it upon my head, my feet were uncovered, and I could not sleep, but my two companions had gone to sleep for they had not done what I had done. There came Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), and he greeted as he used to greet (by saying as-Salamu 'Alaikum). He then came to the mosque and observed prayer and then came to his drink (milk) and uncovered it, but did not find anything in it. He raised his head towards the sky, and I said (to myself) that he (the Holy Prophet) was going to invoke curse upon me and I would be thus ruined; but he (the Holy Prophet) said: Allah, feed him who fed me and give drink to him who provided me drink. I held tight the sheet upon myself (and when he had supplicated), I took hold of the knife and went to the goats (possessed by the Holy Prophet) so that I may slauhter one for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) which was the fattest amongst them, and in fact all of them were milch goats; then I took hold of the vessel which belonged to the family of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in which they used to milk and drink therefrom, and milked them in that until it swelled up with foam. I came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and he said: Have you taken your share of the milk during the night ? I said: Drink it. and he drank it; he then handed over (the vessel) to me and I said: Allah's Messenger, drink it, and he drank it and handed over (the vessel) to me again, I then perceived that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had been satiated and I had got his blessings. I burst into laughter (so much) so that I fell upon the ground, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Miqdad, it must be one of your mischiefs. I said: Allah's Messenger, this affair of mind is like this and this. and I have done so. Thereupon. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: This is nothing but a mercy from Allah. Why is it that you did not give me an opportunity so that we should have awakened our two friends and they would have got their share (of the milk)? I said: By Him Who has sent you with Truth. I do not mind whatever you give (to them), and whatever the (other) people happen to get, when I had got it along with you from among the people.
[5104]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Mughira with the same chain of transmitters.
[5105]
'Abd al-Rahman b. Abu Bakr reported: We were one hundred and thirty (persons) with Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Does any one of You possess food? There was a person with (us) who had a sa' of flour or something about that, and it was kneaded. Then a tall polytheist with dishevelled hair came driving his flock of sheep. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Would you like to sell it (any one of these goats) or offer it as a gift or a present? He said: No, (I am not prepared to offer as a gift), but I would sell it. He (the Holy Prophet) bought a sheep from him, and it was slaughtered and its meat was prepared, and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded that its liver should be roasted. He (the narrator) said: By Allah, none among one hundred and thirty persons was left whom Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had not given a part out of her liver; if anyone was present he gave it to him. but if he was absent it was set aside for him. And he (the Holy Prophet) filled two bowls (one with soup and the other with mutton) and we all ate out of them to our hearts' content, but (still) some part was (left) in (those) two bowls, and I placed it on the camel-(or words to the same effect).
[5106]
'Abd al-Rabman b. Abu Bakr reported that the people of Suffa were very poor. Once the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said (to his Companions): He who amongst you has food for two persons should take three (guests with him). and he who has with him food for four persons should take five or six (guests with him for entertaining them). It was (in accordance with these instructions of the Holy Prophet) that Abu Bakr brought three persons, and the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) brought ten persons (as guests to their respective houses). Abu Bakr had brought three persons (he himself, and myself), my father and my mother (along with therm). He (the narrator) said: I do not know whether he also said: My wife and one servant who was common between our house and that of Abu Bakr. Abu Bakr had had his evening meal with Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). He stayed here until night prayer had been offered. He then came back (to the house of Allah's Apostle) and stayed there until Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) felt drowsy and (Abu Bakr) then came (back to his own house) when (a considerable) part of the night had been over, as Allah had desired. His wife said to him: What held you back from your guests? He said: Oh! have you not served them the evening meal (by this time)? She said: It was in fact served to them. but they refused to eat until you came. He ('Abd al-Rahman) said: I slunk away and bid myself. He (Abu Bakr) said: O, you stupid fellow, and he reprimanded me, and said to the guests: Eat, though it may not be pleasant now. He said: By Allah. I will never eat it He ('Abd al-Rahman) said: By Allah. we did not take a morsel when from beneath that (there appeared) more until they had eaten to their fill, and lo! it was more than what it was before. Abu Bakr saw that and found that it was so or more than that. He said to his wife: Sister of Band Firis, what is th-is? She said: By the coolness of my eyes. it is in excess by three times over the previous one. Then Abu Bakr ate saying: That was from the Satan (viz. his vow for not eating the food). He then took a morsel out of that and then took it (the rest) to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and it was kept there until morning, and during (those days) there was a covenant between us and some other people, and the period of covenant was over, and we had appointed twelve officials with every person amongst them. It is Allah only Who knows as to how many people were there with each of them. He sent (this food to them) and all of them ate out of it.
[5107]
'Abd al-Rahman b. Abd Bakr reported: There came to our house some guests. It was a common practice with my father to (go) and talk to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) during the night. While going he said: 'Abd al-Rahman, entertain the guests. When it was evening we served the food to them, but they refused saying: So long as the owner of the house does not come and join us, we would not take the meal. I said to them: He ('Abd Bakr) is a stern person, and if you would not do that (if you do not take the food). I fear, I may be harmed by him, but they refused. As he (my father) came, the first thing he asked was: Have you served the guests? They (the peopleof the household) said: We have not served them sofar. He said: Did I not command 'Abd al-Rahman (to do this)? He ('Abd al-Rahman) said: I slunk away and kept myself away by that time. He again said: O stupid fellow, I ask you on oath that In case you hear my voice you come to me. I came and said: By Allah, there is no fault of mine. These are your guests; you may ask them. I provided them with food but they refused to eat until you came. He said to them: Why is it that you did not accept our food? By Allah, I shall not even take food tonight (as you have not taken). They said: By Allah, we would not take until you join us. Thereupon he Abu Bakr) said: I have never seen a more unfortunate night than this. Woe be to thee! that you do not accept from us food prepared for you. He again said: What I did first (that is the taking of vow for not eating the food) was prompted by the Satan. Bring the food. The food was brought, and he ate by reciting the name of Allah and they also ate, and when it was morning he came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, their oath (that of the guests) came to be true, but mine was not true, and after that he informed him of the whole incident. He said: Your oath came to be the most true and you are the best of them. He (the narrator) said. I do not know whether he made an atonement for it.
[5108]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Food for two persons suffices three persons and food for three persons suffices four persons.
[5109]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: I heard Allah'.s Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Food for one person suffices two persons and food for two persons suffices four persons, and food for four persons suffices eight persons; and in the tradition transmitted on the authority of Ishaq there is no mention of the fact that he heard it directly (from the Holy Prophet).
[5110]
A hadith like this is reported on the authority of Jabir but with a different chain of transmitters.
[5111]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Food for one suffices two and food for two suffices for tour.
[5112]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Food for one (person) sqffices two, and food for two (persons) suffices four persons and food for four persons suffices eight persons.
[5113]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying that a non-Muslim eats in seven intestines whereas a Muslim eats in one intestine.
[5114]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Ibn 'Umar but with a different chain oi transmitters.
[5115]
Nafi' reported that Ibn 'Umar saw a poor man. He placed food before him and he ate much. He (Ibn 'Umar) said: He should not come to me. for I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying that the non-Muslim eats in seven intestines.
[5116]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A believer eats in one intestine, whereas a non-believer eats in seven intestines.
[5117]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Jabir.
[5118]
Abu Musa reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A believer eats in one intestine, whereas a non-believer eats in seven intestines.
[5119]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira with a different chain of transmitters.
[5120]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) invited a non-Muslim. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded that a goat be milked for him. It was milked and he drank its milk. Then the second one was milked and he drank its milk, and then the other one was milked and he drank its milk. till he drank the milk of seven goats. On the next morning he embraced Islam. And Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded that a goat should be milked for him and he drank its milk and then another was milked but he did not finish it, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: A believer drinks In one intestine whereas a non-believer drinks in seven intestines.
[5121]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) never found fault with food (served to him). If he liked anything, he ate it and if he did not like it he left it.
[5122]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters.
[5123]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of A'mash.
[5124]
Abu Huraira reported: I never saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) finding fault with food (served to him); if he liked it he ate it, and if did not like it he kept silent.
[5125]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through a different chain of transmitters.
[5126]
Umm Salama, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), said: He who drinks in the vessel of silver in fact drinks down in his belly the fire of Hell.
[5127]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Ubaidullah through other chains of transmitters: He who eats or drinks in the vessel of silver and gold,- but there is no mention in any one of them of the words pertaining to eating and gold.
[5128]
Abd al-Rahman reported on the authority of his mother's sister Umm Salama who said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He who drank in vessels of gold or silver he in fact drank down in his belly the fire of Hell.
[5129]
Mu'awiya b. Suwaid b. Muqarrin reporxed: I visited al-Bara' b. 'Azib and heard him say: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded us to do seven things and forbade us to do seven (things). He commanded us to visit the sick, to follow the funeral procession, to answer the sneezer, to fulfil the vow, to help the poor, to accept the invitation and to greet everybody, and he forbade us to wear rings or gold rings, to drink in silver (vessels), and to use the saddle cloth made of red silk, and to wear garments made of Qassi material, or garments made of silk or brocade and velvet.
[5130]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Ash'ath b. Sulaim with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight change of wording that he made no mention of: "to fulfil the vows" but substituted these words: "finding of the lost articles".
[5131]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ash'ath b. Abu ashSha'tha' with the same chain of transmitters (and with these words): There is no doubt about the words: To fulfil the vows were mentioned and this addition had been made in the. hadith: (The Holy Prophet) forbade drinking in silver vessels, for one who drinks (in them) in this world would not drink (in them) in the Hereafter.
[5132]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ash'ath b. Sulaim with the same chain of transmitters but with this difference that instead of the words: Ifsha as-Salam (spreading the salutations), he substituted the words Radd as-Saldm (i.e. responding to the words of salutation) and he said : He forbade (the use of) gold ring.
[5133]
This hadith has been narrated on the auttiniity of Ash'ath b. Sulaim with the same chain of transmitters but the words (pertaining to) Ifsha as-Salam and the (use) of gold ring have been reported without doubt.
[5134]
'Abdullah b. Ukaim reported : While we were with Hudhaifa in Mada'in he asked for water. A villager brought a drink for him in a silver vessel. He (Hudhaifa) threw it away saying: I inform you that I have already conveyed to him that he should not serve me drink in it (silver vessel) for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had said: Do not drink in gold and silver vessels, and do not wear brocade or silk, for these are meant for them (the non-believers) in this world, but they are meant for you in the Hereafter on the Day, of Resurrection.
[5135]
This badith has been reported on the authority of 'Abdullah b. Ukaim with a slight variation of wording.
[5136]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of lbn 'Ukaim through another chain of transmitters, but in this hadith no mention is made of the words: ,On the Day of Resurrection"
[5137]
Shu'ba reported from al-Hakam that he heard 'Abd al-Rahmin (i.e. Ibn Abu Laila) as saying: I personally saw Hudhaifa asking for water in Mada'in and a man giving it to him in a silver vessel. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[5138]
This badith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba through another chain of transmitters. but there is no mention of the fact: ',I personally saw him" in this hadith.
[5139]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Hudhaila with the same chain of transmitters.
[5140]
'Abd al-Rahmin b. Abu Laili reported that Hudhaifa asked for water and a Magian gave him water in a silver vessel, whereupon he said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not wear silk or brocade and do not drink ifi vessels of gold and silver, and do not eat in the dishes made of them (i.e. gold and silver), for these are for them (the non-believers) in this world.
[5141]
Ibn Umar reported that Umar b. Khattab saw (some one selling) the garments of silk at the door of the mosque, whereupon he said: Allah's Messenger, would that you buy it and wear it for the people on Friday and for (receiving) the delegations when they come to you? Upon this. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: go who wears it has no share (of reward) in the Hereafter. Then these garments were sent to Allah"s Messenger (may peace be upon him), and he presented one of these silk garment to Umar. Thereupon Umar said: You make me wear (this silk garment) Whereas you said about the silk garment of Utarid (the person who had been busy selling this garment at the door of the mosque) what you had to say, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I have not presented you this for wearing it (but to make use of its price) ; so 'Umar presented it to his polytheist brother in Mecca.
[5142]
This hadith has been narrated by Ibn Umar through another chain of transmitters.
[5143]
Ibn Umar reported that Umar saw Utarid al-Tamimi standing in the market (and selling) the silk garments, and he was the person who went to (courts of) kings and got (high prices) for these garments from them. Umar said: Allah's Messenger I saw 'Utarid standing in the market with a silk garment; would that you buy and wear it for (receiving) the delegations of Arabs when they visit you? I (the narrator) said: I think he ('Umar) also said: You may wear it on Friday (also). Thereupon, Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) said: He who wears silk in this world has no share in the Hereafter. Later on when these silk garments were presented to Allah's Massenger (may peace be upon him) he presented one silk garment to 'Umar and presented one also to Usama b. Zaid and gave one to 'Ali b. Abu 'Talib. saying: Tear them and make head coverings for your ladies. 'Umar came carrying his garment and said: Allah's Messenger, you have sent it to me, whereas you had said yesterday about the (silk)garment of Utarid what you had to say. He (the Holy Prophet) said: I have not sent it to you that you wear it, but I have sent It to you so that you may derive benefit out of it; and Usama (donned) the garment (presented to him) and appeared to be brisk, whereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) looked at him with a look by which he perceived that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did not like what he had done. He said: Allah's Messenger. why is it that you look at me like this. whereas you yourself presented it to me ? He said : I never sent it to you to wear it, but I sent It to you so that you may tear it and make out head covering for your ladies.
[5144]
Abdullah b. Umar reported: 'Umar b. at-Khattab found a silk garment being sold in the market ; he purchased it and brought it to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, get it and adorn yourself (by wearing it) on the 'Id (days) and for the delegation. Thereupon, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: That is the dress of one who has no share (in the Hereafter). 'Umar stayed there so long as Allah wished. Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent him a silk cloak. 'Umar came back with that to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger. you said that it is the dress of one who has no share in the Hereafter, but then you sent it to me. Thereupon, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: You sell it and meet your need (with its proceeds).
[5145]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Shihab with the same chain of transmitters.
[5146]
lbn 'Umar reported that 'Umar saw a person of the tribe of 'Utirid selling a garment made of brocade or silk and said to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him): Would that you buy it? Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: He who wears it has no share for him in the Hereafter. Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was presented with a striped silk garment and he sent it to him ('Umar). He (,Umar) said: You sent it to me whereas I heard from you about it what you had to say, whereupon he (Allah's Messenger) said: I sent it to you so that you may benefit by it.
[5147]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Umar through another chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording (and the words are that the Holy Prophet) said: I sent it to you so that you might derive benefit from it. but I did not send it to you to wear it.
[5148]
Ibn 'Umar reported that 'Umar saw a person with a garment of brocade and he brought it to Allah's Apostle (may peace he upon him)-the rest of the hadith is the same,except for the words that he (the Holy Prophet) said: I sent it to you that you might get money thereby.
[5149]
Abdullah. the freed slave of Asma' (the daughter of Abu Bakr). the maternal uncle of the son of 'Ata, reported: Asma' sent me to 'Abdullah b. 'Umar saying: The news has reached me that you prohibit the use of three things: the striped robe. saddle cloth made of red silk. and the fasting in the holy month of Rajab. 'Abdullah said to me: So far as what you say about fasting in the month of Rajab, how about one who observes continuous fasting?-and so far as what you say about the striped garment, I heard Umar b. Khatab say that he had heard from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) : He who wears silk garment has no share for him (in the Hereafter), and I am afraid it may not be that striped garment; and so far as the red saddle clotb is concerned that is the saddle cloth of Abdullah and it is red. I went back to Asma' and informed her. whereupon she said : Here is the cloak of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). and she brought out to me that cloak made of Persian cloth with a hem of brocade, and its sleeves bordered with brocade and said: This wall Allah's Messenger's cloak with 'A'isha until she died, and when she died. I got possession of it. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to wear that, and we waslied it for the sick and sought cure thereby.
[5150]
Khalifa b. Ka'b AbCi Dhubyan reported: I heard 'Abdullah b. Zubair addressing the people and saying: Behold! do not dress yuor women with silk clothes for I heard 'Umar b. Khattab as sayinp that he had heard Allah's messenger(may peace be upon him) as saying:Do not wear silk, for one who wear it in this world will not wear it in the Hereafter.
[5151]
'Asim al-Abwal reported on the authority Abu Uthman saying: 'Umar wrote to us when we were in Adharba'ijan saying:'Utba b. Farqad, this wealth is neither the result of your own labour nor the result of the labour of your father, nor the result of the labour of your mother, so feed Muslims at their own places as you feed (members of your family and yourselves at your own residence), and beware of the life of pleasure, and the dress of the polytheists and wearing of silk garments, for Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him) forbade the wearing of silk garments, but only this much, and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) raised his.forefinger and middle finger and he joined. them (to indicate that only this much silk can be allowed in the dress of a man).'Asim said also: This is what is recorded in the lette., (sent to us), and Zuhair raised his two fingers (to give an idea of the extent to which silk may be used).
[5152]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of 'Asim.
[5153]
Abu 'Uthman reported: While we were with 'Utba b. Farqad there came a letter of 'Umar (containing the instructions) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had said: None should wear silk (with the exception of so much) but he will have nothing of it in the Hereafter. Abu 'Uthman said: To the extent of two fingers which are close to the thumb, and I was shown the (silk) borders of the Tayalisa mantle (which were about two fingers in breadth and I saw them.
[5154]
Qatada reported: I heard Abe 'Uthman al-Nahdi as saying: There came to us a letter of 'Umar as we were in Adharba'ijan or in Syria in the company of 'Utba b. Farqad (and the letter ran thus): After (usual praise and glorification of Allah) it is stated that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) has forbidden the use of silk btit to the extent of these two fingers, and Abu Uthman said: We at once understood by these words that he meant (silk) patterns on (the cloth).
[5155]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Qatada but there is no mention of the words of Abd Uthman.
[5156]
Suwaid b. Ghafala said: 'Umar addressed us at a place known as Jabiya (Syria) and he said: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) forbade us the wearing of silk but to the extent of two or three fingers or four fingers.
[5157]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Qatada with the same chain of transmitters.
[5158]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported that one day Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) put on a cloak made of brocade, which had been presented to him. He then quickly put it off and sent it to 'Umar b. Khattab, and it was said to him: Messenger of Allah. why is it that you put it of immediately. whereupon he said: Gabriel forbade me from it (i.e. wearing of Ods garment), and 'Umar came to him weeping and said: Messenger of Allah you disapproved a thing but you gave it to me. What about me, then? Thereupon be (the Holy Prophet) Wd: I did not give it to you to wear it, but I gave you that you might sell it; and so he (Hadrat Umar) sold it for two thousand dirhams.
[5159]
'Ali reported: A silk cloak was presented to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). and he sent it to me and I wore it. but then found some sign of disapproval upon his face, whereupon he said: I did not send it to you that you wear it, but I sent it to you so that you might tear it and make out head dream for your women.
[5160]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Mubammad b. Ja'far but with a slight variation of wording.
[5161]
'Ali reported that Ukaidir of Duma presented to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) a silk garment, and he presented it to 'Ali. and said: Tear it to make head covering for Fitimas out of it. This tradition is transmitted on the authority of Abu Bakr, and Abu Kuraib said: Among the women.
[5162]
'Ali b. Abu Talib reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave me to wear a garment in the form of silk cloak. I went out wearing it, but saw signs of anger on his face, so I tore it and distributed it amongst my women.
[5163]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may Peace be upon him) sent a silk gown to 'Umar, whereupon 'Umar said: You sent it to me whereas you said what you had to, say (i.e. it is forbidden for men). Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: I did not send it to you so that you might wear it, but I sent it to you so that you might derive benefit from its price.
[5164]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He who wore silk in this world would not wear it in the Hereafter.
[5165]
Abu Umama reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: He who wore silk in this world would not wear it in the Hereafter.
[5166]
Uqba b. 'Amir said: A silk go vn was presented to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and he wore it and observed prayer in it and then returned and put it off so violently as if he despised it. He then said: It does not befit the Godfearing persons.
[5167]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of azid b. Abu Habib with the same chain of transmitters.
[5168]
Anas b. Malik reported to them (his companions) that Allah's Messnger (may peace be upon him) had granted concession to Abd al-Rahman b. *Anf and Zubair b. 'Awwam for the wearing of a silk shirt during the journey and because of itch which they both had or any other disease from which both of them had been suffering.
[5169]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sa'd with the same chain of transmitters but there is no mention of the word "journey".
[5170]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) granted concession, or Zubair b. Awwam and 'Abd Al-Rahman b. Auf were granted concession, for the wearing of silk because of the itch that they both had.
[5171]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[5172]
Anas b. Malik reported that 'Abd al-Rahman b. Auf and Zu'bair. b. 'Awwam complained to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about lice; he granted them concession to wear shirts of silk.
[5173]
'Abdullah b. 'Amr b. al-As reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saw me wearing two clothes dyed in saffron. whereupon he said: These are the clothes (usually worn by) the non-believers, so do not wear them.
[5174]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Yahya b. Abu Kathir with the same chain of trarnmitteis.
[5175]
'Abdullah b. 'Amr reported: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) saw me in two clothes dyed in saffron, whereupon he said: Has your mother ordered you to do so? And I said: I will wash them. He said: But burn them.
[5176]
'Ali b. Abu Talib reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade wearing of silk and yellow clothes, and the gold ring, and the reciting of the Qur'an in the ruku' (state of kneeling in prayer).
[5177]
Ali b. Abu Talib reported: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) forbade me to recite the Qur'an while I am in ruku; and the wearing of gold and clothes dyed in saffron.
[5178]
'Ali b. Abu Talib reported: Allah's Meisenger (may peace be upon him) forbade me to use gold rings. to wear silk clothes and to recite the Qur'an in ruku' and sajda (prostration), and to wear yellow garments.
[5179]
Qatada said: We asked Anas b. Malik which garment did Allah's Messenger may peace be upon him) love or like (to wear). He said: The mantle of Yemen.
[5180]
Anas reported that the garment most liked by Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was the mantle of Yemen.
[5181]
Abu Burda reported: I visited A'isha and she brought out for us the coarse lower garfnent (of Allah's Messenger) made in Yemen and clothes made out of Mulabbada cloth, and she swore in the name of Allah that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) died in these two clothes.
[5182]
Abu Burda reported that A'isha brought out for us the lower garment and the upper garment made of the Mulabbada cloth and said : It was in these (clothes) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) died. Ibn Hatim(one of the narrators) in his narration Wd: The lower garment of coarse cloth.
[5183]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Ayyub with a slight variation of wording.
[5184]
A'isha reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) went out one morning wearing a blanket made of (camel's or sheep's) black hair with patterns of camel saddles upon it.
[5185]
A'isha reported that the pillow on which Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) reclined was of leather stuffed with palm fibre.
[5186]
A'isha reported that the bedding on which.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) slept was made of leather stuffed with palm fibre.
[5187]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Hisham b. 'Urwa with a slight variation of wording.
[5188]
Jabir reported: When I was married, Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) asked me if I had got the carpet. I said: How can we have carpets? (i.e. I am so poor that I cannot even think of carpets). whereupon he said: You shall soon possess them.
[5189]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported: When I was married. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) asked me if I had got carpets. I said: How can we have carpets? Thereupon he Wd: You will soon have. Jabir said: My wife had possessed a carpet. and I said to her to remove that away from me, but she would say! Allah's Messenger (may peace be npon him) had said: Yon will soon have. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sufyin with the saule chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[5190]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that Allah's Messengor (may peace be upon him) said: There should be a bedding for a man. a bedding for his wife and the third one for the guest, and the fourth one is for the Satan.
[5191]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: Allah will not look upon him who trails his garment out of pride.
[5192]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Umar through other chains of transmitters also with the addition of these words: "On the Day of Resurrection."
[5193]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him) having said: He who trails his (lower) garment out of pride, Allah will not look toward him on the Day of Resurrection.
[5194]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Umar through another chain of transmitters.
[5195]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: He who trailed his garment out of pride, Allah would not look toward him on the Day of Resurrection.
[5196]
Salim reported: I heard Ibn Umar as saying that he had heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying like this (as mentioned above) but with a slight variation of wording [that instead of the word thaub (cloth) there is the word thiyab (the clothes)].
[5197]
Muslim b. Yannaq reported that Ibn Umar saw a person trailing his lower garment, whereupon he said: From whom do you come? He described his relationship (with the tribe he belonged) and it was found that he belonged to the tribe of Laith. Ibn .Umar recognised him and said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) with these two ears of mine saying: He who trailed his lower garment with no other intention but pride, Allah would not look toward him on the Day of Resurrection.
[5198]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Muslim b. Yannaq through another chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[5199]
Mubammad b. 'Abbad b. ja'far reported: I ordered Muslim b. Yasar, the freed slave of Nafi' b. 'Abd al-Harith, while I was sitting between them, that he should ask Ibn 'Umar if he had heard anything from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) pertaining to one who trails his lower garment out of pride. He said: I heard him (the Holy Prophet) as saying: Allah will not look toward him on the Day of Resurrection.
[5200]
Ibn 'Umar reported: I happened to pass before Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon bin) with my lower garment trailing (upon the ground). He said: 'Abdullah, tug up your lower garment,, I tugged it up, and he again said: Tug it still further, and I tugged it still further and I went on tugging it afterward, whereupon some of the people said: To what extent ? Thereupon he said: To the middle of the shanks.
[5201]
Abu Huraire reported that he saw a person whose lower garment bad been trailin. and he was striking the ground with his foot (conceitedly). He was the Amir of Bahrain and it was being said: Here comes the Amir, here comes the Amir. He (Abu Huraira) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Allah will not look toward him who trails his lower garment out of pride.
[5202]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters and in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Ibn ja'far (the words are): Marwan had made Abu Huraira as his deputy. and in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Ibn Muthanna (the words are). Abu Huraira was the Governor of Medina.
[5203]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said that there was a person who used to walk with pride because of his thick hair and fine mantles. He was made to sink in the earth and he would go on sinking in the earth until the Last Hour would come.
[5204]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira but with a different chain of transmitters.
[5205]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There was a person who walked with pride because of his (fine) mantles and well pleased with his personality. Allah made him sink in the earth and he would go on sinking in that until the Day of Resurrection.
[5206]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Huraira but with a slight variation of wording: While there was a man who strutted in his two mantles.
[5207]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him) as saying: There was a person (living before you) who took pride in his cloak. the rest of the hadith is the same.
[5208]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) forbade the wearing of gold signet ring.
[5209]
Abdullah b. 'Abbas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saw a person wearing a gold signet ring in his hand. He (the Holy Prophet) pulled it off and threw it away, saying: One of you is wishing live coal from Hell. and putting it on his hand. It was said to the person after Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had left: Take your signet ring (of gold) and derive benefit out of it. whereupon he said: No, by Allah, I would never take it when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) has thrown it away.
[5210]
'Abdullah reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upol him) got fashioned a signet ring of gold but he kept its stone on the inner side of his palm as he wore it, so the people (following his example) got fashioned (such rings). Then one day as he sat on the pulpit he pulled it away saying: I wore this ring and kept its stone towards the inner side. He then threw it away, and said: By Allah, I will never wear it; so the people threw their rings away.
[5211]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Umar through other chains of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[5212]
Ibn Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had made for himself a ring of silver, and he (wore it in his finger). then it was in Abu Bakr's finger. then it was in'Umar's finger. then it was in 'Uthman's finger. until it fell into the well of Aris and it had these words engraved upon it (Muhammad, Messenger of Allah). Ibn Numair narrated it with a slight variation of words.
[5213]
Ibn Umar reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon hirn) had made for himself a gold ring; then lie discarded it. and then made for himself a silver ring. and had these words engraved upon it (Mubamrnad, Messenger of Allah), and said: No one should engrave anything like the engraving of this signet ring of mine. and when he Wore it. he kept its stone towards the inside of his palm, and it was this which fell down (from the hands) of Mu'ayqib into the well of Aris.
[5214]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had made for him a silver ring. and got engraved on it (Mubamrnad, Messenger of Allah) and said to the people I have got made a ring of silver and engraved in it (these words) (Mubamrnad, Messenger of Allah). So none should engrave these (words) like this engravement.
[5215]
This hadith nas been reported on the authority of Anas through another chain of transmitters but there is no mention of the words (Mubamrnad, Messenger of Allah)in it.
[5216]
Anas b. Malik reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) decided to write letters to the Byzantine (Emperor) they (his Companions) told him that they would not read a letter unless it is sealed. (Then) Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had a silver ring made (for himealf), (its shape is to vivid in my mind) as if I see its brightness in the band of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and its engravement was (Mubamrnad, Messenger of Allah).
[5217]
Anas reported that when Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) decided to write (letters) to non-Arabs (i.e. Persian and Byzantine Emperors) it was said to him that the non-Arabs would not accept a letter but that having a seal over it; so he (the Holy Prophet) got a silver ring made. He (Anas) said: I perceive as if I am looking at its brightness in his hand.
[5218]
Anas reported that when Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) decided to write to the Kisri (the King of Persia), Caesar (Emperor of Rome), and the Negus (the Emperor of Abyssinia), it was said to him that they would not accept the letter without the seal over it; so Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) got a seal made, the ring of which was made of silver and there was engraved on it. (Mubammad. the Messenger of Allab).
[5219]
Anas b. Malik reported: I saw one day on the finger of Allah's Messenger (may peace be Upon him) a silver ring; so the people also got silver rings made and wore them Then Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) discarded his ring, and the people also discarded their rings.
[5220]
Anas b. Malik reported that one day he saw on the finger of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) a silver ring, and the people also made silver rings and put them on. Then Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) threw his ring away, and so the people also threw away their rings.
[5221]
A hadith like this has been reported on the authority of Ibn Juraij with the same chain of transmitters.
[5222]
Anas b. Malik reported that the ring of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was made of silver and it had an Abyssinian stone in it.
[5223]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) wore a silver ring on his right hand which had an Abyssinian stone in it, and he kept its stone towards the palm.
[5224]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Yunus b. Yazid with the same chain of transmitters.
[5225]
Anas reported that the ring of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) was on this, and he pointed toward the little finger of his left hand.
[5226]
Ali reported: He the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him), forbade me that I should wear my ring in this (forefinger) or in that near it. 'Asim (one of the narrators in the chain of transmitters) said: He did not remember which of the two (fingers) he pointed out; and he forbade to wear Qassi material (silk garments), and to sit on the silk saddle cloth, and he said: As regards Qassi, it is a variegated garment which was brought from Egypt and Syria which had figures upon it, and as regards Mayathir, it is something which women prepared for their husbands as red cloths for their saddles.
[5227]
A hadith like this has been reported on the authority of 'Ali through a different chain of transmitters.
[5228]
'Ali b. Abu Talib reported that he (Allah'.s Apostle) forbade or forbade me. the rest of the hadith is the same.
[5229]
'Ali reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade me that I should wear a ring in this and that finger of mine, and he pointed to the middle finger and the next one.
[5230]
Jabir reported: I heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) saying during an expedition in which we also participated: Make a general practice of wearing sandals, for a man is riding as it were when he wears sandals.
[5231]
Abu Huraire reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When one of you puts on sandals, he should first put in the right foot, and when he takes off he should take off the left one first, or he should put them on together or take them off together.
[5232]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: None of you should walk in one sandal; either he should wear the two or should take off the two.
[5233]
Abu Razin reported: Abu Huraira came to us and he struck his forehead with his hand and said: Behold I you talk amongst yourself that I attribute wrongly to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) (certain things) in order to guide you to the right path.In such a case, I would myself go astray. Listen. I bear testimony to the fact that I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saying: When the thong of any one of you is broken, he should not walk in the second one until he has got it repaired. This hadith has been reported on the authority of Abu Huraira with a different chain of transmitters.
[5234]
Jabir reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade that a man should eat with the left hand or walk with one sandal or wrap himself completely leaving no opening for the arms (to draw out) or support himself when sitting with a single garment wrapped round his knees which may expose his private parts.
[5235]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When the thong of the shoe of any one of you is cut off. he should not walk with one sandal until he has got the thong repaired, and he should not walk with one shoe and he should not eat with his left hand and should not wrap his cloth round his knees or wrap himself completely leaving no room for the arins.
[5236]
Jabir reported that Allab's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the wrapping of oneself completely leaving no room for the arm and supporting oneself when sitting with a single garment wrapped round one's knees and a person raising one of his feet and placing it on the other while lying on his back.2512
[5237]
Jabir. b. Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not walk in one sandal and do not wrap the lower garment round your knees and do not eat with your left hand and do not wrap yourself completely leaving no room for the arms (to draw out) and do not place one of your feet upon the other while lying on your back.
[5238]
Jalbir b. Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: None of you should lie on his back and place one of his feet upon the other.
[5239]
'Abbad b. Tamim reported from his uncle that he saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) lying in the mosque and placing his one foot upon the other.
[5240]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitter.
[5241]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace he upon him) forbade dyeing (one's cloth or hair) in saffron. Hammad said that it pertains to men only.
[5242]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade that a person should (wear) clothes dyed in saffron.
[5243]
Jabir reported that when Abu Qubafa (father of Abu Bakr) came in the yeu of Victory or on the Day of Victory (to the Holy Prophet to pledge his allegiance to him) his head and his beard were white like hyssop. He (the Holy Prophet) commaded or the women were commanded by him that they should change this with something (that the colour of his hair should be changed).
[5244]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that Abu Qubafa was led (to the andience of the Holy Prophet) on the day of the Conquest of Mecca and his head and beard were white like hyssop, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Change it with something but avoid black.
[5245]
Abu Horaira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Jews and the Christians do not dye (their hair), so oppose them.
[5246]
A'isha reported that Gabriel (peace be upon him) made a promise with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to come at a definite hour; that hour came but he did not visit him. And there was in his hand (in the hand of Allah's Apostle) a staff. He threw it from his hand and said: Never has Allah or His messengers (angels) ever broken their promise. Then he cast a glance (and by chance) found a puppy under his cot and said: 'A'isha, when did this dog enter here ? She said: BY Allah, I don't know He then commanded and it was turned out. Then Gabriel came and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: You promised me and I waited for you. but you did not come, whereupon he said: It was the dog in your house which prevented me (to come), for we (angels) do not enter a house in which there is a dog or a picture.
[5247]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Hazim with the same chain of transmitters that Gabriel had promised Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that he would come ; the rest of the hadith is the same, but it is not so lengthy as the other one.
[5248]
Maimuna reported that one morning Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was silent with grief. Maimuna said: Allah's Messenger, I find a change in your mood today. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Gabriel had promised me that he would meet me tonight, but he did not meet me. By Allah, he never broke his promises, and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) spent the day in this sad (mood). Then it occurred to him that there had been a puppy under their cot. He commanded and it was turned out. He then took some water in his hand and sprinkled it at that place. When it was evening Gabriel met him and he said to him: you promised me that you would meet me the previous night. He said: Yes, but we do not enter a house in which there is a dog or a picture. Then on that very morning he commanded the killing of the dogs until he announced that the dog kept for the orchards should also be killed, but he spared the dog meant for the protection of extensive fields (or big gardens).
[5249]
Abu Talha reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) having said: Angels do not enter a house in which there is a dog or a picture.
[5250]
Abu Talha reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Angels do not enter the house in which there is a dog or a statue.
[5251]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters.
[5252]
Abu Tilha, the Companion of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: Verily, angels do not enter the house in which there is a picture. Busr reported : Zaid fell ill and we went to inquire after his health and (found) that there was hanging at his door a curtain with a picture on it. I said to 'Ubaidullah Khaulani who had been under the patronage of Maimuna, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him): Did not Zaid himself inform us before about (the Holy Prophet's command pertaining to the pictures), whereupon 'Ubaidullah said: Did you not hear when he said: "Except the prints on the cloth" ?
[5253]
Abu Talha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Angels do not enter a house in which there is a picture. Busr said: Zaid b. Khalid fell sick and we visited him to inquire after his health. As we were in his house (we saw) a curtain having pictures on it. I said to 'Ubaidullah Khaulani: Did he not narrate to us (the Holy Prophet's command pertaining to pictures)? Thereupon he said: He in fact did that (but he also said): Except the prints upon the cloth. Did you not hear this? I said: No, whereupon He said: He had in fact made a mention of this.
[5254]
Abu Talha Ansari reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Angels do not enter the house in which there is a picture or portraits. I came to 'A'isha and said to her: This is a news that I have received that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had said: Angels do not enter the house in which there is a picture or a dog, (and further added) whether she had heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) making a mention of it. She said: No (I did not hear this myself), but I narrate to you what I saw him doing. I bear testimony to the fact that he (the Holy Prophet) set out for an expedition. I took a carpet and screened the door with it. When he (the Holy Prophet) came back he saw that carpet and I perceived signs of disapproval on his face. He pulled it until it was torn or it was cut (into pieces) and he said: God has not commanded us to clothe stones and clay. We cut it (the curtain) and prepared two pillowa out of it by stuffing them with the fibre of date-palms and he (the Holy Prophet) did not find fault with it.
[5255]
A'isha reported: We had a curtain with us which had portraits of birds upon it. Whenever a visitor came, he found them in front of him. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upop him) said to me: Change them, for whenever I enter the room) I see them and it brings to my mind (the pleasures) of worldly life. She said: We had with us a sheet which had silk badges upon it and we used to wear it. This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Ibn Muthanna but with this addition: 'Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did not command us to tear that."
[5256]
A'isha reported : Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came back from the journey and I had screened my door with a curtain having portraits of winged horses upon it. He commanded me and I pulled it away.
[5257]
This hadith has been narrpted on the authority of Waki' with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[5258]
A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) entered (my apartment) and I had hung (on the door of my apartment) a thin curtain having pictures on it. The colour of his face underwent a change. He then took hold of that curtain and tore it and then said: The most grievous torfnent for the people on the Day of Resurrection would be for those who try to imitate Allah in the act of creation.
[5259]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of A'isha through another chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording (and the variation is that the narrator is reported to have said): He (the Holy Prophet) inclined towards that curtain and tore it with his hand.
[5260]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[5261]
A'isha reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) visited me. and I had a shelf with a thin cloth curtain hangin. over it and on which there were portraits. No sooner did he see it than he tore it and the colour of his face underwent a change and he said: A'isha, the most grievous torment from the Hand of Allah on the Day of Resurrection would be for those who imitate (Allah) in the act of His creation. A'isha said: We tore it into pieces and made a cushion or two cushions out of that.
[5262]
A'isha reported she had a cloth havinc, pictures upon it and it was hanging upon the shelf and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Take it (away) from me (from my sight), so I removed it and made cushions from that.
[5263]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[5264]
A'isha reported: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) visited me when I had screened (my door) with a carpet having pictures on it. He removed it and we made cushions out of that.
[5265]
A'isha, the wife of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), reported that she had hung a curtain which had pictures upon it. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) entered (the room) and he pulled it. A'isha said: I then tore it and prepared two cushions out of that. A person who was then in that company and whose name was Rabi'a b. 'Ata, the freed slave of Banu Zuhra, asked: Did you hear Abu Mabammad making a mention of A'isha having stated that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to recline upon them? lbn al-Qasim said: No, but I heard Qasim b. Muhammad saying so.
[5266]
A'isha reported that she bought a carpet which had pictures on it. When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saw that, he stayed at the door and did not get in. I perceived or I was made to perceive upon his face signs of disgust. She said: Allah's Messenger, I offer repentance to Allah and His Messenger. (but tell me) what is the sin that I have committed. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: What is this carpet? She said: I bought it for you so that you might sit on it and take rest. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The owners of these pictures would be tormented and they would be asked to bring to life what they tried to create. He then said: Angels do not enter the house in which there is a picture.
[5267]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of A'isha through another chain of transmitters also. Some of the other ahadith narrated through other chains of transmitters are more complete and there is an addition in them (transmitted through other chains of transmitters). In the hadith transmitted on the authority of the nephew of Majishun she (A'isha) is reported to have said: I took it and prepared two cushions out of that and he (the Holy Prophet) used to recline against them in the house.
[5268]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: Those who paint pictures would be punished on the Day of Resurrection and it would be said to them: Breathe soul into what you.have created.
[5269]
Ibn 'Umar reported a hadith like this through another chain of transmitters.
[5270]
'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Verity the most grievously tormented people on the Day of Resurrection would be the painters of pictures. Ashajj (one of the narrators) in the hadith narrated by him did not make mention of the word "verity".
[5271]
This haditli has been reported on the authority of Abu Mu'awiya through another chain of tranmitters (and the words are): "Verity, the most grievously tormented people amongest the denizens of Hall on the Day of Resurrection would be the painters of pictures. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[5272]
Muslim b. Subaih reported: I was with Masriuq in the house which had the portrayals of Mary (hadrat Maryan). Thereupon Masriuq said: These are portraits of Kisra. I said: No, these are of Mary. Masruq said: I heard Abdullah b, Mas'ud as saying Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had said : The most grievously tormented people on the Day of Resurrection would be the painters of pictures. (Muslim said): I read this before Nasr b.'Ali at-Jahdami and he read it before other narrators, the last one being Ibn Sa'id b Abl at Hasan that a person came to Ibn 'Abbas and said: I am the person who paints pictures; give me a religious verdict about them. He (Ibn 'Abbas) said to him: Come near me (still further). He came near him so much so that he placed his hand upon his head and said: I am going to narrate to yor what I heard from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). I heard him say: All the painters who make pictures would be in the fire of Hell. The soul will be breathed in every picture prepared by him and it shall punish him in the Hell, and he (Ibn 'Abbas) said: If you have to do it at all, then paint the pictures of trees and lifeless things; and Nasr b.'Ali confirmed it.
[5273]
Anas b. Malik said: I was sitting with Ibn Ahbas when he gave religious verdicts but he did not say that it was Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) who had said that. However when a man said to him (Ibn 'Abbas) : I am the painter of these pictures. Ibn 'Abbas said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who painted pictures in the world would be compelled to breathe soal in them on the Day of Resurrection, but he would not be able to breathe soul (in them).
[5274]
Nadr b. Anas reported that a person came to Ibn 'Abbas and he narrated (the above menlioned hadith) from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him).
[5275]
Abu Zur'a reported: I visited the house of Marwan in the company of Abu Huraira and he found pictures there. whereupon he said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah, the Glorious and Exalted, said: Who is a more wrongdoer than one who tries to create creation like Mine creation. Let him create an atom or a grain of wheat or that of barley. This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Zur'a and he said : Abu Huraira went to the house of Sa'ld or Marwan which they had built in Medina and he (Abu Huraira) saw a painter who had been painting pictures in his house, whereupon he told that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had said like this, but he made no mention of the words: "Let him create the grain of barley."
[5276]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Angels do not enter the house in which there are portrayals or pictures.
[5277]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Angels do not accompany the travellers who have with them a dog and a bell.
[5278]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Suhail with the same chain of transmitters.
[5279]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The bell is the musical instrument of the Satan.
[5280]
Abu Bashir Ansari reported that he had had (the opportunity of accompanying Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in some of his journeys. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent one of his messengers 'Abdullah b Abi Bakr said: I think he said (these words) when the people were at the places of rest: No necklace of strings be left on the necks of the camels or the necklace kept unbroken. Imam Malik said: To my mind (this practice) of wearing necklace round the necks of camels or animals was because of the fact that they (wanted to save them) from the influence of the evil eye.
[5281]
Jabir reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade (the animals to be beaten) on the face or cauterisation on the face.
[5282]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Jabir b.'Abdullah through another chain of transmitters.
[5283]
Jabir reported that there happened to pass before Allah's Apostle(may peace be upon him) an ass the face of which had been cauterised, whereupon he said: Allah has cursed one who has cauterised it (on the face).
[5284]
Ibn Abbas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saw an ass which had been cauterised on the face. He disapproved of it saying: By Allah, I do not cauterise (the animal) but on a part at a distance from the face, and commanded (for the cauterisation) of his ass and it was cauterised on the buttocks and he was the first to cauterise on the buttocks.
[5285]
Anas reported that Umm Sulaim gave birth to a child. She said to him: Anas, see that nothing is given to this child until he is brought to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) in the morning, so that he should chew some dates and touch his palate with it. I went to him in the morning and he was in the garden at that time having the mantle of Jauniyya over him and he was bus in cauterising (the camels) which had been brought to him (as spoils of war) in victory (over the enemy).
[5286]
Anas reported that when his mother gave birth to a child they brought that child to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) so that he might chew some dates and touch his palate with them. and Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) was at that time in the fold busy in cauterising the animals Shu'ba said: So far as I know (he was cauterising) their ears.
[5287]
Anas reported: We went to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as he was in the fold and he was cauterising the animals of the flock and I think (he was cauterising them) on their ears. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba through another chain of transmitters.
[5288]
Anas b. Malik reported: I saw in the hand of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) an instrument for cauterisation and he was cauterising the caracia collected as Zakat.
[5289]
Ibn Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade Qaza. I said to Nafi: What is Qaza'? He said: This means having a part of a boy's head shaved and leaving a part unshaven.
[5290]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of 'Ubaidullah with the same chain of transmitters. and the exposition of Qaza' is the same as that of Abu Usama.
[5291]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Umar b. Nafi' with the same chain of transmitters and Muhammad b. Muthanna as well as 'Umar b. Nafi have given the same exposition (of the word Qaza') in their narration.
[5292]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Umar through another chain of transmitters.
[5293]
Abu Sa'id Kbudri reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Avoid sitting on the paths. They (his Companions) said: Allah's Messenger. there is no other help to it (but to sit here as we) hold our meetings and discuss matters there. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: If you have to sit at all, theg fulfil the rights, of the path. They said: What are their rights? Thereupon he said: Keeping the eye downward (so that you may not stare at the women), refraining from doing some harm to the other and exchanging mutual greetings (saying as-Salamu 'Alaikum to one another) and commanding the good and forbidding the evil.
[5294]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Zaid b. Aslam with the same chain of transmitters.
[5295]
Asma', daughter of Abu Bakr, reported that a woman came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said: I have a daughter who has been newly wedded. She had an attack of smallpox and thus her hair had fallen; should I add false hair to her head? Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Allah has cursed the woman who adds some false hair and the woman who asks for it.
[5296]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Shu'ba with a slight variation of wording.
[5297]
Asma', daughter of Abu Bakr, reported that a woman came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said: I have married my daughter (whose) hair of head have fallen. Her spouse likes them (the long hair). Allah's Messenger(may add false hair to her head ? He forbade her to do this.
[5298]
A'isha reported that a girl of the Ansar who had fallen ill and had lost the hair was married. They (her relatives) thought of adding false hair (to her head). so they asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about it, whereupon he cursed the woman who adds false hair and the woman who asks for it.
[5299]
A'isha reported that a woman from the Ansar married her daughter who had lost her hair because of illness. She came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said: Her husband wants that false hair should be aaded to her head. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The woman who adds false hair has been cursed. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Nafi' with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[5300]
Ibn Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) cursing the woman who added false hair and the woman who asked for tattoos. This hadith has been reported on the authority of Abdullah through another chain of transmitters.
[5301]
'Abdullah reported that Allah had cursed those women who tattooed and who have themselves tattooed, those who pluck hair from their faces and those who make spaces between their teeth for beautification changing what God has created. This news reached a woman of the tribe of Asad who was called Umm Ya'qub and she used to recite the Holy Qur'an. She came to him and said: What is this news that has reached me from you that you curse those women who tattooed and those women who have themselves tattooed, the women who pluck hair from their faces and who make spaces between their teeth for beautification changing what God has created? Thereupon 'Abdullah said: Should I not curse one upon whom Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) has invoked curse and that is in the Book also. Thereupon that woman said: I read the Qur'an from cover to cover, but I did not find that in it. whereupon he said: If you had read (thoroughly) you would have definitely found this in that (as) Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, has said: "What Allah's Messenger brings for you accept that. and what he has forbidden you. refrain from that." That woman said: I find this thing in your wife even now. Thereupon he said: Go and see her. She reported: I went to the wife of 'Abdullah but found nothing of this sort in her. She came back to him and said: I have not seen anything. whereupon he said: Had there been anything like it in her, I would have never slept with her in the bed.
[5302]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Mansur with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[5303]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Mansur without the story pertaining to Umm Ya'qub.
[5304]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abdullah.
[5305]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) reprimanded that a woman should add anything to her head (in the form of artificial hair).
[5306]
Abd al-Rahman b. 'Auf said that he heard Mu'awiya b Sufyin during the season of Hajj. (saying) as he sat upon the pulpit holding a bunch of hair in his hand which was (previously) in the hand of his sentinel: O people of Medina, where are your scholars? I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbidding this and saying: That the people of Bani Isra'il were ruined at the time when their women wore shuch hair.
[5307]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Zuhri but with a slight variation of wording.
[5308]
Sa'id b. Musayyib reported: Mu'awiya came to Medina and he addressed us and he took out a bunch of hair and said: What do I see that one of you does but that what the Jews did? (I can well recall) that when this act (adding of artificial hair) reached Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), he named it as cheating.
[5309]
Sa,id b. Musayyib reported that Mu'awiya said one day : Should I narrate to you the evil make-up. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) forbade cheating. It was during that time that a person came with a staff and there was a cloth on its head, whereupon Mu,awiya said : Behold, that is cheating. Qatada said: This implies how women artificially increase their hair with the help of rags.
[5310]
AbU Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said this: Two are the types of the denizens of Hell whom I did not see : people having flogs like the tails of the ox with them and they would be beating people, and the women who would be dressed but appear to be naked, who would be inclined (to evil) and make their husbands incline towards it. Their heads would be like the humps of the bukht camel inclined to one side. They will not enter Paradise and they would not smell its odour whereas its odour would be smelt from such and such distance.
[5311]
A'isha reported that a woman said: Allah's Messenger, may I say to my (co-wife) that my husband has given me (such and such) a thing but which he has not in fact gives me? 'Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The one who makes a false statement of that which one has not been given is like one who wears a garment of falsehood.
[5312]
Asma' reported that a woman came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said: I have a co-wife. Is there any harm for me if I give her the false impression (of getting something from my husband which he has not in fact given me)? Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The one who creates such a (false impression) of receiving what one has not been given is like one who wears the garment of falsehood.
[5313]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters.
[5314]
Anas reported that person at Baqi' called another person as "Abu'l- Qasim," and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) turned towards him. He (the person who had uttered these words) said: Messenger of Allah, I did not mean you, but I called such and such (person), whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: You may call yourself by my name, but not by my kunya.
[5315]
Ibn Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The names dearest to Allah are 'Abdullah and 'Abd al-Rahman.
[5316]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that a child was born to a perfon amongst us and he gave him the name of Muhammad. Thereupon his people said: We will not allow You to give the name of Muhammad (to your child) after the name of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). He set forth with his son carrying him on his back and came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him', and said: Allah's Messenger a son has been born to me and I havegiven him the name after the name of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Give him my name but do not give him my kunya, for I am Qasim in the sense that I distribute (the spoils of war) and the dues of Zakat amongst you.
[5317]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that a child was born to one of the persons amongst us and he decided to give him the name of Muhammad We said: We will not allow you to give the name after the name of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) until you ask him (the Holy Prophet). So he (that person) came and said (to the Holy Prophet): A child was born in my house and I wanted to give him the name (of Muhammad) after the name of Allah's Messenger, whereas my people did not allow me that I should name him after that (sacred) name until I have asked Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) in this connection, whereupon he said: Give him the name after my name, but do not call him by my kunya, for I have been sent as a Qasim as I distribute amongst you.
[5318]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Husain With the same chain of transmitters but no mention is made of these words: "(I have been sent as a distributor), so I distribute amongst you."
[5319]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Give the name after my name, but do not give (the kunya of Abu'l-Qasim after my) kunya, for I am Abu'l-Qasim (in the sense) that I distribute amongst you (the spoils of war) and disseminate the knowledge (of revelation). This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Bakr but with a slight variation of wording.
[5320]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters but there is a slight variation (of wording) that, instead of the word Bu'ithat (I have been sent), the word ju'ilat (I have been made) has been used.
[5321]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that a child was born to a person from the Ansar and he made up his mind to give him the name of Muhammad. He came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and, asked him (about it), whereupon he said: The Ansar have done well to give the name (to your children) after my name, but do nct give them the kunya after my kunya.
[5322]
This hadith has been narrated through different chains of transmitters on the authority of Shu'ba with a slight variation of wording.
[5323]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: A child was born in the house of a person amongst us, and he gave him the name of Qasim. We said: We will not allow you (to give the name) to your child as Qasim (and thus adopt the kunya of Abu'l-Qasim) and coal your eyes. He (that person) came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and made a mention of that to him, whereupon he said: Call your son 'Abd al-Rahman.
[5324]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Ibn Uyaina, but there is no mention of this: "We will not allow you to cool your eyes."
[5325]
Abu Huraira reported that Abu'l-Qasim (may peace be upon him) said: Give name (to your children) after my name but do not give the kunya (of Abu'l- Qasim) after my kunya. 'Amr reported from Abu Huraira that he did not say that he had heard it directly from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him).
[5326]
Mughira b. Shu'ba reported: When I came to Najran, they (the Christians of Najran) asked me: You read "O sister of Harun" (i.e. Hadrat Maryam) in the Qur'an, whereas Moses was born much before Jesus. When I came back to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) I asked him about that, whereupon he said: The (people of the old age) used to give names (to their persons) after the names of Apostles and pious persons who had gone before them.
[5327]
Samura b. Jundub reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade us to give names to our servants as these four names: Aflah (Successful), Rabdh (Profit), Yasar (Wealth), and Nafi' (Beneficial).
[5328]
Samura b. Jundub reported AUah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Don't give names to your servants as Rabdh, 'Ya ar,Aflah and Nafi'.
[5329]
Samura b. Jundub reprted: The dearest words to Allah are four: Subhan Allah (Hallowed be Allah), Al-Hamdulillah (Praise be to Allah), Wa la ilaha illa-Allah (There is no god but Allah), Allah-o-Akbar (God is the Greatest). There is no harm for you in which order you begin (them while remembering Allah), and he also said: Do not give these names to your servants, Yasar and Rabah and Nafi and Najth.
[5330]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Shu'ba and there is no mention but of the fact about giving the name to the servant and there is no mention of the four expressions (of remembrance) and he did not mention the four words
[5331]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) decided to forbid (his followers) to name persons as Ya'la (Elevated), Baraka (Blessing), Aflah (Successful), Yasar and Nafi', but I saw that he kept silent after that and he did not say anything until Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) died. And he did not forbid (his followers to do this), then 'Umar decided to prohibit (people) from giving these names, but later on gave up the idea.
[5332]
Ibn 'Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) changed the name of 'Asiya (Disobedient) and said: You are Jamila (i.e. good and handsome). Ahmad (one of the narrators) narrated it with a slight variation of wording.
[5333]
Ibn 'Umar reported that 'Umar had a daughter who was called 'Asiya. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave her the name of Jamila.
[5334]
Ibn Abbas reported that the name of Juwairlya (the wife of the Holy Prophet) was Barra (Pious). Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) changed her name to Juwairiya and said : I did not like that it should be said: He had come out from Barra (Pious). The hadith transmitted on the authority of Ibn Abi 'Umar is slightly different from it.
[5335]
Abu Huraira reported that the name of Zainab was Barra. It was said of her: She presents herself to be innocent. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave her the name of Zainab.
[5336]
Zainab, daughter of Umm Salama, reported: My name first was Barra. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave me the name of Zainab. Then there entered (into the house of Allah's Prophet as a wife) Zainab, daughter of Jahsh, and her name was also Barra, and he gave her the name of Zainab.
[5337]
Muhammad b. 'Amr b. 'Ata' reported : I had given the name Barra to my daughter. Zainab, daughter of Abu Salama, told me that Allah's' Messenger (may peace be upon him) had forbidden me to give this name. (She said) : I was also called Barra, but Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said : Don't hold yourself to be pious. It is God alone who knows the people of piety among you. They (the Companions) said: Then, what name should we give to her ? He said: Name her as Zainab.
[5338]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The vilest name in Allah's sight is Malik al-Amidh (King of Kings). The narration transmitted on the authority of Shaiba (contains these words) : There is no king but Allah, the Exalted and Glorious. Sufyan said: Similarly, the word Shahinshah (is also the vilest appellation). Ahmad b. Hanbal said: I asked Abu 'Amr about the meaning of Akhna. He said: The vilest.
[5339]
Abu Huraira reported from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) so many ahadith and one of them was this that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The most wretched person in the sight of Allah on the Day of Resurrection and the worst person and target of His wrath would of the person who is called Malik al-Amlak (the King of Kings) for there is no king but Allah.
[5340]
Anas b. Malik reported: I took 'Abdullah b. Abi Talha Ansari to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) at the time of his birth. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was at that time wearing a woollen cloak and besmearing the camels with tar. He said: Have you got with you the dates ? I said: Yes. He took hold of the dates and put them in his mouth and softened them, then opened the mouth of the infant and put that in it and the child began to lick it. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The Ansar have a liking for the dates, and he (the Holy Prophet) gave him the name of 'Abdullah.
[5341]
Anas b. Malik reported that the son of Abu Talha had been ailing. Abu Talha set out (on a journey) and his son breathed his last (in his absence). When Abu Talha came back, he said (to his wife): What about my child? Umm Sulaim (the wife of Abu Talha) said: He is now in a more comfortable state than before. She served him the evening meal and he took it. He then came to her (and had sexual intercourse with her) and when it was all over she said: Make arrangements for the burial of the child. When it was morning. Abu Talha came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and informed him, whereupon he said: Did you spend the night with her. He said : Yes. He (the Holy Prophet) then said : O Allah, bless both of them (and as a result of blessing) she gave birth to a child. Abu Talha said to me (Anas b. Malik) to take the child, (so I took him) and came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). She (Umm Sulaim) also had sent some dates (along with the child). Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) took him (the child) (in his lap) and said: Is there anything with you (for Tahnik). They (the Companions) said: Yes. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) took hold of them (dates and chewed them). He then put them (the chewed dates) in the mouth of the child and then rubbed his palate and gave him the name of 'Abdullah.
[5342]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Anas through another chain of transmit ters.
[5343]
Abu Musa reported: A child was born in my house and I brought him to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upod him) and he gave him the name of Ibrahim and he rubbed his palate with dates.
[5344]
'Urwa b. Zubair and Fatima daughter of Mandhir b. Zubair, reported that Asma' daughter of Abu Bakr was at the time of migration in the family way with 'Abdullah b. Zubair (in her womb). She came to Quba' and gave birth to 'Abdullah at that place and then sent him to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) so that he should rub his palate with chewed dates. Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) took hold of him (the child) and he placed him in his lap and then called for dates. 'A'isha said: Some time was spent before we were able to find them. He (the Holy Prophet) chewed them and then put his saliva in his mouth. The first thing that entered his stomach, was the saliva of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). Asma' said: He then rubbed him and blessed him and gave him the name of Abdullah. He ('Abdullah) went to him (the Holy Prophet) when he had attained the age of seven or eight years in order to pledge allegiance to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as Zubair had commanded him to do. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) smiled when he saw him coming towards him and then accepted his allegiance.
[5345]
Asma' reported that she had become pregnant at Mecca with Abdullah b. Zubair (in her womt) and she (further) said: I set out (for migration to Medina) as I was in the advanced stage of pregnancy. I came to Medina and got down at the place known as Quba' and gave birth to a child there. Then I came to Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him). He placed him (the child) in his lap and then commanded for the dates to be brought. He chewed them and then put the saliva in his mouth. The first thing which went into his stomach was the saliva of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). He then rubbed his palate with dates and then invoked blessings for him and blessed him. He was the first child who was born in Islam (after Migration).
[5346]
Asma', daughter of Abu Bakr, reported that when she migrated to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in Medina she was in the family way with Abdullah b. Zubair in her womb.
[5347]
'A'isha reported that the new-born infants were brought to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). He blessed them and rubbed their palates with dates.
[5348]
'A'isha reported: We took 'Abdullah b. Zubair to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) so that he should put saliva in his mouth and we had to make a good deal of effort in order to procure them.
[5349]
Sahl b. Sa'd reported that Mundhir b. Aba Usaid was brought to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) at the time of his birth Allah's.Apostle (may peace be upon him) placed him on his thigh and Abfi Usaid kept sitting there. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had been occupied with something else before him. Abu Usaid commanded his child to be lifted from the lap of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and so he was lifted. When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had finished the work he said: Where is the child? Abd Usaid said: Allah's Messenger, we took him away. He said: What is his name? He said; Allah's Messenger, it is so and so, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Nay, his name is Mundhir, and named him Mundhir on that day.
[5350]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had the sublimest character among mankind. I had a brother who was called Abd 'Umair. I think he was weaned. When Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) came to our house he saw him, and said: Abu 'Umair, what has the sparrow done? He (Anas) said that he had been playing with that.
[5351]
Anas b Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) addressed me: O My Son.
[5352]
Mughira b. Shu'ba reported that none else had asked more questions from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about the Dajjal than I, but he simply said in a slight mood): O, myson, why are you worried because of him? He will not harm you. I said: The people think that he would have with him rivers of water and mountains of bread, whereupon he said: He would be more insignificant in the sight of Allah than all these things (belonging to him).
[5353]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Ismail, with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[5354]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported: I wins sitting in Medina in the company of the Ansar that Abu Musa came trembling with fear. We said to him: What is the matter? He said: 'Umar (Allah be pleated with him) sent for me. I went to him and paid him salutation thrice at (his) door but he made no response to me and so I came back Thereupon he ('Umar) said: What stood in your way that you did not turn up? I said:I did come to you and paid you salutations at your door three times but I was not given any response, so I came back as the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) has said: When any one of you seeks permission three times and he i.e not granted permission, he should come back. Umar said: Bring a witness to support that you say, otherwise I shall take you to task. Ubayy b. Ka'b said: None should stand with him (as a witness) but the youngest amongst the people. Abu Sa'id said: I am the youngest amongst the people, whereupon he said: Then you go with him (to support his contention).
[5355]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Yazid b. Khusaifa with the same chain of transmitters but with this addition: Abu Sa'id said: So I stood up, and went to 'Umar and gave witness (to what Abu Musa had said).
[5356]
Abd Sa'id Khudri reported: We were in the company of Ubayy b. Ka'b that Abu Musa Ash'ari came there in a state of anger. He stood (before us) and said: I ask you to bear witness in the name of Allah whether anyone amongst you heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Permission (for entering the house) should be sought three times and if permission is granted to you (then get in). otherwise go back. Ubayy b. Ka'b said: What is the iiiatter? He said: I sought permission yesterday from 'Umar b. Khattab three times but he did not permit me, so I came back; then I went to him today and visited him and informed him that I had come to him yesterday and greeted him thrice, then came back, whereupon he said: Yes, we did hear you but be were at that time busy, but why did you not seek permission (further and you must have never gone back until you were permitted to do so). He said: I sought permission (in the manner) that I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said (in connection 'With the seeking of permission for entering the house of a stranger). Thereupon he (Hadrat Umar) said: By Allah, I shall torture your back and your stomach unless you bring one who may bear witness to what you state. 'Ubayy b. Ka'b said: By Allah, none should stand with you (to bear testimony) but the youngest amongst us. And he therefore, said to Abu Sa'id: Stand up. So I stood up until I came to Umar and said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say this.
[5357]
Abu Sa'id reported that Abu Musa al-Ash'ari came to the door of 'Umar and sought his permission (to get into his house). Umar said: That is once. He again sought permission for the second time and 'Umar said: It is twice. He again sought permission for the third time and Umar said: It is thrice. He (Abu Musa) then went back. He (Hadrat 'Umar) (sent someone) to pursue him so that he should be brought back. Thereupon he (Hadrat Umar) said: If this act (of yours is in accordance with the command of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) you have preserved in your mind, then it is all right, otherwise (I shall give you such a severe punishment) that it will serve as an example to others. Abu Sa'id said: Then he (Abu Musa) came to us and said: Do you remember Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said this: "Permission is for three times"? They (Companions sitting in that cothpany) began to laugh, whereupon he (Abu Musa) said: There comes to you your Muslim brother who had been perturbed and you laugh. Abu Sa'id said: (Well), you go forth. I shall be your participant in this trouble of yours. So he came to him (Hadrat Umar) and said: Here is Abu Sa'id (to support my statement).
[5358]
This hadith bu been narrated on the authority of Abu Sa'id Khudri through another chain of transmitters.
[5359]
'Ubaid b. Umair reported that Abu Musa brought permission from Umar (to enter the house) three times, and finding him busy came back, whereupon Umar said (to the Inmates of his house): Did you not hear the voice of 'Abdullah b. Qais (the Kunya of Abu Musa Ash'ari) ? He was called back. and he (Hadrat 'Umar) said: What did prompt you to do it? Thereupon, he said: This is how we have been commanded to act. He (Hadrat 'Umar) said: Bring evidence (in support of) it, otherwise I shall deal (strictly) with you. So he (Abu Musa) set out and came to the meeting of the Ansar and asked them to bear witness before hadrat Umar about this. They (the Companions present there) said: None but the youngest amongst us would bear out this fact. So Abu Sa'id Khudri (who was the youngest one in that company) said: We have been commanded to do so (while visiting the house of other people). Thereupon 'Umar said: This command of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had remained hidden from me up till now due to (my) business in the market.
[5360]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Ibn Juraij, but there is no mention of the words "business in the market".
[5361]
Abu Musa Ash'ari reported that he went to 'Umar b. Khattab and greeted him by saying: As-Salamu-'Alaikum, here is 'Abdullah b. Qais, but he did not permit him (to get in). He (Abu Musa Ash'ari) again greeted him with as-Salamu-'Alaikum and said: Here is Abu Musa, but he (Hadrat 'Umar) did not permit him (to get in). He again said: As-Salam-u-'Alaikum, (and said) here is Ash'ari, (then receiving no response he came back). He (Hadrat 'Umar) said: Bring him back to me, bring him back to me So he went there (in the presence of Hadrat 'Umar) and he said to him: Abu Musa, what made you go back, while we were busy in some work? He said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may.peace be upon him) as saying: Permission should be sought thrice. And if you are permitted, (then get in), otherwise go back. He said: Bring witness to this fact, otherwise I shall do this and that, i.e. I shall punish you. Abu Musa went away and 'Umar said to him (on his departure): It he (Abu Musa) finds a witness he should meet him by the side of the pulpit in the evening and it he does not find a witness you would not find him there. When it was evening he (Hadrat 'Umar) found him (Abu Musa) there. He (Hadrat 'Umar) said: Abu Musa, have you been able to find a witness to what you have said? He said: Yes. Here is Ubayy bin Ka'b, whereupon he (Hadrat 'Umar) said: Yes, he is an authentic (witness). He (Hadrat 'Umar) said: Abu Tufail (the kunya of Ubayy b. Ka'b), what does he (Abu Musa say? Thereupon he said: Ibn Khattab,I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying so. Do not prove to be a hard (task-master) for the Companions of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), whereupon he Hadrat 'Umar said: Hallowed be Allah. I had heard something (in this connection), but I wished it to be established (as an undeniable fact).
[5362]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Talha b. Yahya with the same chain of transmitters but with this variation of wording: He (Hadrat 'Umar) said: Abu Mundhir (the Kunya of Ubayy b. Ka'b), did you hear this from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? Thereupon he said: Yes. and he further said: Ibn Khattab, do not be a torment for the Companions of Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him). No mention has, however, been made of the words of 'Umar: "Hallowed be Allah" and what follows subsequently.
[5363]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported: I came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and called him (with a view to seeking permission). whereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Who is it? I said: It is I. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) came out saying: It is I. it is I.
[5364]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported: I sought permission from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upoh him) to see him. He said: Who is it? I said: It is I. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: It is I. it is I (these words lead me to no conclusion).
[5365]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Shu'ba with a slight variation of wording and that is: The Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) uttered these words: It is I. it is I." in the manner as if he disapproved of this.
[5366]
Sahl b. Sa'd as-Sa'id reported that a person peeped through the hole of the door of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and at that time Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had with him a scratching instrument with which he had been scratching his head. When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saw him. he said: If I were to know that you had been peeping through the door, I would have thrust that into your eyes, and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Permission is needed as a protection against glance.
[5367]
Sahl b. Sa'd as-Sa'idi reported that a person peeped through the hole of the door of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and he had with him some pointed thing with which he had been adjusting (the hair of his head). Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: If I were to know that you had been peeping. I would have thrust it in your eyes. Allah has prescribed seeking permission because of protection against glance.
[5368]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Sahl b. Sa'd as-Sa'idi with a slight variation of wording.
[5369]
Anas b. Malik reported that a person peeped in some of the holes (in the doors) of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) (and he found him) standing up (lifting) an arrow or some arrows. The narrator said: I perceived as if Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was going to pierce (his eyes).
[5370]
Abu Huraira reported having heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say: He who peeped into the house of people without their consent, it is permissible for them to put out his eyes.
[5371]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If a person were to cast a glance in your (house) without permission, and you had in your hand a staff and you would have thrust that in his eyes, there is no harm for you.
[5372]
Jarir b. 'Abdullah reported: I asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about the sudden glance (that is cast) on the face (of a non-Mahram). He commanded me that I should turn away my eyes.
[5373]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Yunus through another chain of transmitters.
[5374]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The rider should first greet the pedestrian, and the pedestrian the one who is seated and a small group should greet a larger group (with as-Salam-u-'Alaikum).
[5375]
Abu Talha reported: While We were sitting in front of the houses and talking amongst ourselves, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) happened to come there. He stood by us and said: What about you apd your meetings on the paths? Avoid these meetings on the paths. We said: We were sitting here without (any intention of doing harm to the passers-by) ; we are sitting to discuss matters and to hold conversation amongst ourselves. Thereupon he said: If there is no help (for you but to sit on these paths), then give the paths their rights and these are lowering of the gaze, exchanging of greetings and good conversation.
[5376]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying : Avoid sitting on the paths. They (the Companions) said: Allah's Messenger, we cannot help but holding our meetings (in these paths) and discuss matters (there). Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: If you insist on holding meetings, then give the path its due right. They said: What are its due rights ? Upon this he said: Lowering the gaze, refraining from doing harm, exchanging of greetings. commanding of good and forbidding from evil.
[5377]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zaid b. Aslam with the same chain of transmitters.
[5378]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Five are the rights of a Muslim over his brother: responding to salutation, saying Yarhamuk Allah when anybody sneezes and says al-Hamdulillah, visiting the sick. following the bier.' Abd al-Razzaq said that this hadith has been transmitted as mursal hadith from Zuhri and he then substantiated it on the authority of Ibn Musayyib.
[5379]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Six are the rights of a Muslim over another Muslim. It was said to him: Allah's Messenger, what are these? Thereupon he said: When you meet him, offer him greetings;when he invites you to a feast accept it. when he seeks your council give him, and when he sneezes and says: "All praise is due to Allah," you say Yarhamuk Allah (may Allah show mercy to you); and when he fails ill visit him; and when he dies follow his bier.
[5380]
Anas b. Malik reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When the People of the Book offer you salutations, you should say: The same to you.
[5381]
Anas reported that the Companions of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said to him: The People.of the Book offer us salutations (by saying as-Salamu- 'Alaikum). How should we reciprocate them ? Thereupon he said: Say: Wa 'Alaikum (and upon you too).
[5382]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When the Jews offer you salutations, tome of them say as-Sam-u-'Alaikum (death be upon you). You should say (in response to it): Let it be upon you.
[5383]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Umar through another chain of transmitters with a slight variation of wording.
[5384]
'A'isha reported that a group of Jews came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and sought his audience and said: As-Sam-u-'Alaikum. A'isha said in response: As-Sim-u-'Alaikum (death be upon you) and curse also, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said : 'A'isha, verily Allah loes kindness in every matter. She said: Did you bear what they said ? Thereupon he said: Did you not hear that I said (to them): Wa 'Alaikum.
[5385]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Zuhri that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I said 'Alaikam, and the transmitter did not make mention of the word "and".
[5386]
'A'isha reported that some Jews came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and they said: Abu'l-Qasim (the Kunya of the Holy Prophet), as-Sam-u-'Alaikum, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Wa 'Alaikum. A'isha reported: In response to these words of theirs, I said: But let there be death upon you and disgrace also, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: 'A'isha, do not use harsh words. She said: Did you hear what they said? Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Did I not respond to them when they said that; I said to them: Wa'Alaikum (let it be upon you).
[5387]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of A'znash with a slight variation of wording. 'A'isha understood their meaning and cursed them and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: 'A'isha. (do not do that) for Allah does not like the use of harsh words, and it was at this stage that this verse of Allah. the Exalt. ed and Glorious. was revealed: "And when they come to thee, they greet thee with a greeting with which Allah greets thee not" (Iviii. 8) to the end of the verse.
[5388]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported that some people from amongst the Jews said to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) Abu'l-Qasim. as-Sam-u-'Alaikum, whereupon he said : Wa 'Alaikum, A'isha was enraged and asked him (Allah's Apostle) whether he had not heard what they had said. He said, I did hear and I retorted to them (and the curse that I invoked upon them would receive response from Allah), but (the curse that they invoked upon us) would not be responded.
[5389]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not greet the Jews and the Christians before they greet you and when you meet any one of them on the roads force him to go to the narrowest part of it .
[5390]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Suhail with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording. The hadith transmitted on the authority of Waki', the words are 'When you meet the Jews." And in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Shu'ba, the words are: 'When you meet the People of the Book." And in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Jarir the words are: "When you meet them," but none amongst the polytheists has been mentioned explicitly by name.
[5391]
Anas b. Malik reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) happened to pass by young boys he would great them. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sayyar with the same chain of transmitters.
[5392]
Sayyar reported: I was walking with Thibit al-Bunani that he happened to pass by children and he greeted them. And Thibit reported that he walked with Anas and he happened to pass by children and he greeted them. and Anas reported that he walked with Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon.him) and he happened,to pass by children and he greeted them.
[5393]
Ibn Mas'ud reported : The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to me : The sign that you have been permitted to come in is that the curtain is raised or that you hear me speaking quietly until I forbid you.
[5394]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Ubaidullah with the same chain of transmitters.
[5395]
A'isha reported that Sauda (Allah he pleated with her) went out (in the fields) in order to answer the call of nature even after the time when veil had been prescribed for women. She had been a bulky lady, significant in height amongst the women, and she could not conceal herself from him who had known her. 'Umar b. Khattab saw her and said: Sauda, by Allah, you cannot conceal from us. Therefore, be careful when you go out. She ('A'isha) said : She turned back. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was at that time in my house having his evening meal and there was a bone in his hand. She (Sauda) cline and said: Allah's Messenger. I went out and 'Umar said to me so and so. She ('A'isha) reported: There came the revelation to him and then it was over; the bone was then in his hand and he had not thrown it and he said: "Permission has been granted to you that you may go out for your needs."
[5396]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters, and the words are: She (Sauda) was a woman who looked to be significant amongst the people (so far as the bulk of her) body was concerned. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[5397]
'A'isha reported that the wives of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to go out in the cover of night when they went to open fields (in the outskirts of Medina) for easing themselves. 'Umar b Khattab used to say: Allah's Messenger, ask your ladies to observe veil , but Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did not do that. So there went out Sauda, daughter of Zarn'a, the wife of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), during one of the nights when it was dark. She was a tall statured lady. 'Umar called her saying : Sauda, we recognise you. (He did this with the hope that the verses pertaining to veil would be revealed.) 'A'isha said : Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, then revealed the verses pertaining to veil.
[5398]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Shihab with the same chain of transmitters.
[5399]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Behold, no person should spend the night with a married woman, but only in case he is married to her or he is her Mahram.
[5400]
'Uqba b. Amir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Beware of getting, into the houses and meeting women (in seclusion). A person from the Ansir said: Allah's Messenger, what about husband's brother, whereupon he said: Husband's brother is like death.
[5401]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Yazid b. Abu Habib with the same chain of transmitters.
[5402]
Ibn Wahb reported: I heard Laith b. Said as saying: Al-Hamv means the brother of husband or like it from amongst the relatives of the husband, for example, cousin, etc.
[5403]
'Abdullah b. 'Amr. b. al-'As reported that some persons from Banu Hisham entered the house of Asma' daughter of 'Umais when Abu Bakr also entered (and she was at that time his wife). He (Abu Bakr) saw it and disapproved of it and he made a mention of that to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: I did not see but good only (in my wife). Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Verily Allah has made her immune from all this. Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stood on the pulpit and said: After this day no man should enter the house of another person in his absence, but only when he is accompanied by one person or two persons.
[5404]
Anas reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was in the company of one of his wives a person happened to pass by them. He called him and when he came, he said to him: 0 so and so, she was my such and such wife. Thereupon he said, Allah's Messenger, if I were to doubt at all, I would have entertained no doubt about you at least. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Verily Satan circulates in the body like blood.
[5405]
Safiyya daughter of Huyyay (the wife of Allah's Apostle) reported that while Allah's Messenger (may peace be.upon him) had been observing I'tikaf, I came to visit him one night and talked with him for some time. Then I stood up to go back and he (Allah's Apostle) also stood up with me in order to bid me good-bye. She was at that time residing in the house of Usama b. Zaid. The two persons from the Ansar happened to pass by him. When they saw Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). they began to walk swiftly, thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to them: Walk calmy, she is Safiyya daughter of Huyyay... Both of them said: Messenger, hallowed be Allah, (we cannot conceive of ab., ug doubtful even in the remotest corners of our minds), whereupon he said: Satan circulates in the body of man like the circulation of blood and I was afraid lest it should instill any evil in your heart or anything. This hadith has been reported on the authority of Safiyya, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), through another chain of transmitters (and the words) are: "She went to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) to visit him as he was observing I'tikaf in the mosque during Ramadan. She talked with him for some time and then stood up to go back and Allikh's Apostle (may peace be upon him) stood up in order to bid her good-bye." The rest of the hadith is the same except with the variation of the words that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: "Satan penetrates in man like the penetration of blood (in every part of body)."
[5406]
Abu Waqid al-Laith reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was sitting in the mosque along wish tome people when there came to him three persons; two of them stepped forward to the direction of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and one of them went away. The two stood by the side of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and one of them found a space in his circle and he sat in that; and the other one sat behind him and the third one went away. When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had finished his work, he said. Should I not inform you about these three persons? One of them sought refuge with Allah and Allah gave him refuge and the second one felt shy and Allah showed kindness to has shyness (and so he was accommodated in that meeting), and the last one reverted and Allah turned away His attention from him.
[5407]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Ishaq b. 'Abdullah b. Talha with the same chain of transmitters.
[5408]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: None of you should make another one stand in the meeting and then occupy his place.
[5409]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: No person should ask another person to stand at his place and then he should himself sit there, but he should simply say: Make room and accommodate.
[5410]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Ibn 'Umar through another chain of transmitters. but with a slight variation of wording.
[5411]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: None should make one'& brother stand and then sit at his place (and it was common with) Ibn Umar that when any person stood in the company (with a view to making room for him) he did not sit there.
[5412]
This hadith hilt been reported on the authority of Ma'mar with the same chain of transmitters.
[5413]
Jabir reported Allah's Apostle (may peace he upon him) as saying: None amongst you should make his brother stand on Friday (during the congregational prayer) and then occupy his-place. but he should only say to him (Accommodate me).
[5414]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When anyone amongst you stands up, and in the badltb transmitted on the authority of Abu 'Awina, the words are: "He who stands in his place and (goes away) and then comes back to it, he his the greatest right (to occupy that).
[5415]
Umm Salama reported that she had a eunuch (as a slave) in her house. Allah's Messenger imay peace be upon him) was once in the house that he (the eunuch) said to the brother of Umm Salama: Abdullahb. Aba Umayya. if Allah grants you victory in Ta'if on the next day, I will show you the daughter of Ghailan for she has four folds (upon her body) on the front side of her stomach and eight folds on the back. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) heard this and he said: Such (people) should not visit you.
[5416]
'A'isha reported that a eunuch used to come to the wives of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and they did not And anything objectionable in his visit considering him to be a male without any sexual desire. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) one day came as he was sitting with some of his wives and he was busy in describing the bodily characteristics of a lady and saying: As the comes in front tour folds appear on her front side and as she turns her back eight folds appear on the back side. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: I me that he knows these things; do not, therefore. allow him to cater. She ("A'isha) said: Then they began to observe veil from him.
[5417]
Asma' daughter of Abu Bakr reported that the was married to Zubair. He had neither land nor wealth nor slave nor anything else like it except a bom. She further said: I grazed his horse. provided fodder to it and looked after it, and ground dates for his camel. Besides this, I grazed the camel, made arrangements for providing it with water and patched up the leather bucket and kneaded the flour. But I was not proficient in baking the bread, so my female neighbours used to bake bread for me and they were sincere women. She further said: I was carrying on my head the stones of the dates from the land of Zubair which Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had endowed him and it was at a distance of two miles (from Medina). She add: As I was one day carrying the atones of dates upon my head I happened to meet Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) along with a group of his Companions. He called me and said (to the camel) to sit down so that he should make cite ride behind hirn. (I told my husband:) I felt shy and remembered your jealousy, whereupon he said: By Allah. the carrying of the stone dates upon your bead is more severe a burden than riding with him. She said: (I led the life of hardship) until Abu Bakr sent afterwards a female servant who took upon herself the responsibility of looking after the horse and I felt as it she had emancipated me.
[5418]
Asma' reported: I performed the household duties of Zubair and he had a horse; I used to look after it. Nothing was more burdensome for me than looking after the horse I used to bring grass for it and looked after it, then I got a servant as Allah's Apustle (may peace be upon him) had some prisoners of war in his possession. He gave me a female servant. She (the female servant) then began to look after the horse and thus relieved me of this burden. A person came and he said: Mother of 'Abdullah, I am a destitute person and I intend that I should start business under the shadow of your house. I (Asma') said: If I grant you permission, Zubair may not agree to that, so you come and make a demand of it when Zubair is also present there. He came accordingly find said: Mother of 'Abdullah. I am a destitute person. I intend to start t mall business in the shadow of your house. I said: Is there not in Medina (any place for starting the business) except my house ? Zubair said: Why is it that you prohibit the destitute man to start business here? So he started business and he (earned so much) that we sold our slave-girl to him There came Zubair to me while the money was in my lap. He said: Give this to me. I said: (I intend) to spend it as charity.
[5419]
Ibn Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When there are three (persons), two should not converse secretly between themselves to the exclusion of the (third) one.
[5420]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of lbn 'Umar through two different chains of transmitters.
[5421]
'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If you are three, two amongst you should not converse secretly between yourselves to the exclusion of the other (third one), unti some other people join him (and dispel his loneliness), for it may hurt his feelings.
[5422]
'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If you are three, two should not converse secretly to the exclusion of your companion for that hurts his feelings.
[5423]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters.
[5424]
'A'isha (the wife of Allah's Apostle) said: When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) fell ill. Gabriel used to recite these verses. "In the name of Allah. He may cure you from all kinds of illness and safeguard vou from the evil of a jealous one when he feels jealous and from the evil influence of eye."
[5425]
Abu Sa'id reported that Gabriel came to AJlah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Muhammad, have you fallen ill ? Thereupon he said: Yes. He (Gabriel) said: "In the name of Allah I exercise you from everything and safeguard you from every evil that may harm you and from the eye of a jealous one. Allah would cure you and I invoke the name of Allah for you."
[5426]
Abu Huraira reported so many abidith from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and he reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The influence of an evil eye is a fact.
[5427]
Ibn 'Abbas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The influence of an evil eye is a fact; if anything would precede the destiny it would be the influence of an evil eye, and when you are asked to take bath (as a cure) from the influence of an evil eye, you should take bath.
[5428]
A'isha reported that a Jew from among the Jews of Banu Zuraiq who was called Labid b. al-A'sam cast spell upon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) with the result that he (under the influence of the spell) felt that he had been doing something whereas in fact he had not been doing that. (This state of affairs lasted) until one day or during one night Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) made supplication (to dispel its effects). He again made a supplication and he again did this and said to 'A'isha: Do you know that Allah has told me what I had asked Him? There came to me two men and one amongst them sat near my head and the other one near my feet and he who sat near my head said to one who sat near my feet or one who sat near my feet said to one who sat near my head: What is the trouble with the man? He said: The spell has affected him. He said: Who has cast that? He (the other one) said: It was Labid b. A'sam (who has done it). He said: What is the thing by which he transmitted its effect? He said: By the comb and by the hair stuck to the comb and the spathe of the date-palm. He said: Where is tbap He replied: In the well of Dhi Arwan. She said : Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent some of the persons from among his Companions there and then said: 'A'isha. by Allah, its water was yellow like henna and its trees were like heads of the devils. She said that she asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as to why he did not burn that. He said: No, Allah has cured me and I do not like that I should induce people to commit any high-handedness in regard (to one another), but I only commanded that it should be buried.
[5429]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was affected with a spell, the rest of the hadith is the same but with this variation of wording: "Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) went to the well and looked towards it and there were trees of date-palm near it. I ('A'isha) said: I asked Allah'& Messenger (may peace be upon him) to bring it out, and I did not say: Why did not you burn it?" And there is no mention of these words: "I commanded (to bury them and they buried."
[5430]
Anas reported that a Jewess came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) with poisoned mutton and he took of that what had been brought to him (Allah's Messenger). (When the effect of this poison were felt by him) he called for her and asked her about that, whereupon she said: I had determined to kill you. Thereupon he said: Allah will never give you the power to do it. He (the narrator) said that they (the Companion's of the Holy Prophet) said: Should we not kill her? Thereupon he said: No. He (Anas) said: I felt (the affects of this poison) on the uvula of Aitah's Messenger.
[5431]
Anas b. Malik reported that a Jewess brought poisoned meat and then served it to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)
[5432]
'A'isha reported: When any person amongst us fell ill, Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) used to rub him with his right band and then say: O Lord of the people, grant him health, heal him, for Thou art a Greet Healer. There is no healere, but with Thy healing Power one is healed and illness is removed. She further added: When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) fell ill, and his illness took a serious turn I took hold of hie hand to that I should do with it what he ward to do with that (i.e. I would rub his body with his sacred hand). But he withdrew his hand from my hand and then said: O Allah, pardon me and make me join the companion. ship on She said. I was gazing at him constantly whereas he had passed away.
[5433]
This. hadith has been reported on the authority of Shu'ba through another chain of transmitters (and the words are): "He rubbed him with his hand" and (in) the hadith transmitted on the authority of Thauri (the words are). "He used to rub with his right hand." This hadith has been reported through another chain of transmitters.
[5434]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) visited the sick he would say: Lord of the people. remove the disease, cure him, for Thou art the great Curer, there is no cure but through Thine healing Power, which leaves nothing of the disease.
[5435]
'A'isha reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to visit any sick he supplicated for him and said: Lord of the people, remove the malady, cure him for Thou art a great Curer. There is no cure but through Thine healing Power which leaves no trouble, and in the narration transmitted on the authority of Abu Bakr there is a slight variation of wording.
[5436]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of 'A'isha through another chain of transmitters with a slight variation of wording.
[5437]
'A'isha reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to recite (this supplication) as the words of incantation: "Lord of the people, remove the trouble for in Thine Hand is the cure; none is there to relieve him (the burden of disease) but only Thou.
[5438]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitted.
[5439]
'A'isha reported that when any of the members of the household fell ill Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to blow over him by reciting Mu'awwidhatan, and when he suffered from illness of which he died I used to blow over him and rubbed his body with his hand for his hand had greater healing power than my hand.
[5440]
'A'isha reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) fell ill, he recited over his body Mu'awwidhatan and blew over him and when his sickness was aggravated I used to recite over him and rub him with his band with the hope that it was more blessed.
[5441]
This hadith has been narrated through some other chains of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording. In the hadith transmitted on the authority of Yanus and Ziyari (the words are): "When Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) fell ill, he blew over his body by reciting Mu'awwidhatan and rubbed him with his hand.
[5442]
'Abd al-Rahman b. al-Aswad reported on the authority of his father: I asked 'A'isha about incantation. She said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had granted its sanction to the members of a family of the Ansir for incantation in curing every type of poison.
[5443]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) granted sanction to the members of a family of the Ansir for incantation (for removing the effects) of the poison of the scorpion.
[5444]
'A'isha reported that when any person fell ill with a disease or he had any ailment or he had any injury, the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) placed his forefinger upon the ground and then lifted it by reciting the name of Allah. (and said): The dust of our ground with the saliva of any one of us would serve as a means whereby our illness would be cured with the sanction of Allab. This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Ibn Abu Shaiba and Zubair with a slight variation of wording.
[5445]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded the use of incantation for curing the influence of an evil eye.
[5446]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Mis'ar with the same chain of transmitters.
[5447]
'A'isha reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) commanded me that I should make use of incantation for curing the influence of an evil eye.
[5448]
Anas b. Malik reported in connection with incantation that he had been granted sanction (to use incantation as a remedy) for the sting of the scorpion and for curing small pustules and dispelling the influence of an evil eye.
[5449]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) granted him sanction to use incantation (as a cure) for the, influence of an evil eye, the sting of the scorpion and small pustules.
[5450]
Umm Salama, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to a small girl in the house of Umm Salama that he had been seeing on her face black stains and told her that that was due to the infiluence of an evil eye, and he asked that she should be cured with the help of incantation (hoping) that her face should become spotles.
[5451]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) granted sanction to the family of Hazm for incantation (in mitigating the effect of the poison of) the snake, and, he said -to Asma' daughter of 'Umais: What is this that I see the children of my brother lean? Are they not fed properly? She said: No, but they fall under the influence of an evil eve. He said : Use incantation She recited (the words of incantation before him), whereupon he (by approving them) said: Yes, use this incantation for them.
[5452]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) granted a special sanction for incantation in case of the snake poison to a tribe of 'Amr. Abu Zubair said: I heard Jabir b. 'Abdullah as saying that the scorpion stung one of us as we were sitting with Allah's Messenger (may peace upon him). A person said: Allah's Messenger, I use incantation (for curing the effect. of sting), whereupon he said: He who is competent amongst you to benefit his brother should do so.
[5453]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Juraij with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[5454]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported I had a maternal uncle who treated the sting of the scorpion with the help of incantation. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade incantation. He came to him and said: Allah's Messenger, you forbade to practise incantation, whereas I employ it for curing the sting of the scorpion, whereupon he said: He who amongst you is capable of employing it as a means to do good should do that.
[5455]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters.
[5456]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) prohibited incantation. Then the people of Amr b. Hazm came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: We know an incantation which we use for curing the sting of the scorpion but you have prohibited it. They recited (the words of incantation) before him, whereupon he said: I do not see any harm (in it), so he who amongst you is competent to do good to his brother should do that.
[5457]
'Auf b. Malik Ashja'i reported We practised incantation in the pre-Islamic days and we said: Allah's Messenger. what is your opinion about it? He said: Let me know your incantation and said: There is no harm in the incantation which does not smack of polytheism.
[5458]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported that some persons amongst the Companions of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) set out on a journey and they happened to pass by a tribe from the tribes of Arabia. They demanded hospitality from the members of that tribe, but they did not extend any hospitality to them. They said to them : Is there any incantator amongst you, at the chief of the tribe has bgen stung by a scorpion? A person amongst us said: 'Yes. So he came to him and he practised incan- tation with the help of Sura al-Fatiha and the person became all right. He was given a flock of sheep (as recompense), but he refused to accept that, saying: I shall make a mention of it to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), and if he approves of it. then I shall accept it. So we came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and made a mention of that to him and he (that person) said: Allah's Messenger by Allah, I did not practice incantation but with the help of Sura al-Fatiha of the Holy Book. He (the Holy Prophet) smiled and said: How did you come to know that it can be used (as incactation) ?- and then said : Take out of that and allocate a share for me along with your share.
[5459]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Abu Bishr with the same the same chain of transmitters (with these words): That he recited Umm-ul-Qur'an (Sura Fatiha), and he collected his spittle and he applied that and the person became all right.
[5460]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported. We landed at a place where a woman came to us and said: A scorpiorn has bitten the chief of the tribe. Is there any incantator amongst you? A person amongst us stood up (and went with her). We had no idea that he had been a good incantator but he practised incantation with the help of Sura al -Fatiha and the (the chief) was all right. They gave him a flock of sheep and served us milk. We said (to him): Are you a good incantatory Thereupon he said: I did not do it but by the help of Sura al-Fitiha. He caid: Do not drive (these goats) until we go to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and find out (whether it is permissible to accept( this reward of incantation). So we came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon hin) and made a rrention of that to him, whereupon he said: How did you come to know that this (Sura al-Fatiha) could be used as an incantation? So distribute them (amongst those who had been present there with him) and allocate a share of mine also.
[5461]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters and he said: There stood up with her a person amongst us whom we did not know before as an incantator.
[5462]
Uthman b. Abu al-'As Al-Thaqafi reported that he nade a complaint of pain to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that he felt in his body at the time he had become Muslim. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Place your hand at the place where you feel pain in your body and say Bismillah (in the name of Allah) three times and seven times A'udhu billahi wa qudratihi min sharri ma ajidu wa ukhdhiru (I seek refuge with Allah and with His Power from the evil that I find and that I fear).
[5463]
Uthman b. Abu al-'As reported that he came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, the Satan intervenes between me and my prayer and my reciting of the Qur'an and he confounds me. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said:, That is (the doing of the Satan) who is known as Khinzab, and when you perceive its effect, seek refuge with Allah from it and spit three times to your left. I did that and Allah dispelled that from me.
[5464]
'Uthman b. Abu al-'As reported that he came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and he narrated like this. In the hadith transmitted on the authority of Salam b. Nuh there is no mention of three times,
[5465]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of 'Uthman b. Abu al-'As with a slight variation of wording.
[5466]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There is a remedy for every malady, and when the remedy is applied to the disease it is cured with the permission of Allah, the Exalted and Glorious.
[5467]
Jabir reported that he visited Muqanna' and then said : I will not go away unless you get yourself cupped, for I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say: It is a remedy.
[5468]
'Asim b. 'Umar b. Qatada reported: There came to our house 'Abdullah and another person from amongst the members of the household who complained of a wound.Jabir said: What ails you? He said: There is a wound which is very painful for me, whereupon he said: Boy, bring to me a cupper. He said: 'Abdullah, what do you intend to do with the cupper? I said: I would get this wound cupped. He said: By Allah. oven the touch of fly or cloth causes me pain (and cupping) would thus cause me (unbearable) pain. And when he saw him feeling pain (at the idea of cupping), he said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If there is any effective remedy amongst your remedies, these are (three): Cupping, drinking of honey and cauterisation with the help of fire. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had said: As for myself I do not like cauterisation. The cupper was called and he cupped him and he was all right.
[5469]
Jabir reported that Umm Salama sought permission from Allah's messenger (may Allah's peace upon him) tor getting herself cupped. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) asked Abu Taiba to cup her. He (Jabir) said: I think he (Abu Taiba) was her faster brother or a young boy before entering upon the adolescent period.
[5470]
Jabir reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent a phystian to Ubayy b. Ka'b.He cut the vein and then cauterised it.
[5471]
A'mash reported this with the same chain of transmitters and he made no mention of the fact that he cut one of his veins.
[5472]
Jabir b. 'Abdillah reported that on the day of Ahzab Ubayy received the wound of an arrow in his medial arm vein. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) cauterised it.
[5473]
Jabir reported that Sa'd b. Mu'adh received a wound of the arrow in his vein. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) cauterised it with a rod and it was swollen, to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did it for the second time.
[5474]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) got himself cupped and gave to the cupper his wages and he put the medicine in the nostril.
[5475]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) got himself cupped and never withheld the wages of anyone.
[5476]
Ibn Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The fever from the vehement raging of the (heat of Hell), so cool it with the help of water.
[5477]
Ibn Umar reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Fever is due to vehemence of the beat of Hell,so cool it with water.
[5478]
Ibn Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Fever is from the vehement raging of the fire of Hell, so extinguish it with water.
[5479]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Fever is from the vehement Paging of the Hell-fire, so cool it with water.
[5480]
'A'isha reported Allah's messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Fever is from the vehement raging of the Hell-fire, so cool it with water.
[5481]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters.
[5482]
Asma' reported that a woman running high fever was brought to her. She asked water to be brought and then sprinkled it in the opening of a shirt at the uppermost part of the chest and said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had said: Cool (the fever) with water. for it is because of the vehemence of the beat of Hell.
[5483]
(Missing)
[5484]
(Missing)
[5485]
(Missing)
[5486]
(Missing)
[5487]
(Missing)
[5488]
(Missing)
[5489]
(Missing)
[5490]
(Missing)
[5491]
(Missing)
[5492]
(Missing)
[5493]
(Missing)
[5494]
(Missing)
[5495]
(Missing)
[5496]
(Missing)
[5497]
(Missing)
[5498]
(Missing)
[5499]
(Missing)
[5500]
(Missing)